Four-star general demoted for improper spending.  
Google: "Government surveillance is on the rise."  
#Obama tells labor he's committed to 'protecting' middle class on taxes.  
Day care owner guilty of murder in Houston fire that killed 4 children.  
President Obama puts nomination of Gen. John Allen as top NATO commander on hold  
Radical cleric Abu Qatada released from jail in Britain.  
Work begins to exhume body of former Palestinian leader Yasser #Arafat  
38 Kenyan police officers reportedly killed in ambush.  
U.S. commander in Afghanistan Gen. John Allen investigated amid #Petraeus probe  
FBI spokeswoman: The #FBI is at the North Carolina home of Paula #Broadwell, who had an affair with David Petraeus.  
Plug-in electric #Tesla Model S is named Motor Trend Car of the Year.  
Gas rationing in New Jersey to end Tuesday morning, Gov. Christie says.  
Lance Armstrong quits board of #Livestrong charity.  
Radical cleric Abu Qatada to be released on bail.  
For second time in 24 hours, fire from #Syria hits #Israel  
Alleged terror fund-raiser Abu Qatada wins deportation battle.  
Syrian opposition coalition agreement formally signed.  #Syria 
Greek Parliament approves the nation's 2013 budget that contains steep #austerity cuts.  #Greece 
USGS: 6.2-magnitude #earthquake struck off the western coast of Guatemala, about 15 miles from Champerico,  
Iraqi authorities execute 10 prisoners for terrorism convictions, the Ministry of Justice says.  
6.6-magnitude earthquake strikes Myanmar, according to USGS  
Biography grew from dissertation on Petraeus leadership, writer Paula Broadwell has said  
No. 1 Alabama loses to No. 15 Texas A&M, 29-24  
Official: Complaint that Petraeus' biographer sent harassing e-mails led FBI to affair  
BBC director general resigns after erroneous child abuse report  
says he expects power in NJ to be almost fully restored statewide by Saturday night.  
Waffle House CEO accused of sexual improprieties by former personal assistant  
Chrysler recalling more than 900,000 Jeeps over airbags  
American Airlines reaches tentative deal with pilots union  
175 misdemeanor marijuana possession charges dropped in Washington state  
U.S. official: FBI investigated tip that Petraeus had affair with biographer  
FBI investigated Petraeus' affair to see if it posed "potential security risk"  
Supreme Court to review enforcement provision of 1965 Voting Rights Act  
Petraeus: "I showed extremely poor judgment by engaging in an extramarital affair."  
CIA Director David Petraeus has resigned  
President Obama: Failure to reach debt reduction deal would force taxes to rise.  
Washington state voters approve same-sex marriage, CNN projects.  
House Speaker #Boehner: President #Obama now has an "opportunity to lead"  
Feds: No federal charges for ex-Syracuse coach Fine in sex abuse case.  
"Decisive" action was taken against U.S. drone in its airspace, #Iran confirms.  
Police probing death at Swedish prime minister's residence, news agency reports  
In wake of U.S. drone incident, #Iran commander backs right to defend territory  
Thousands of refugees flee #Syria for Turkey amid fierce fighting, official says.  
Navy: 7 members of SEAL Team 6 gave classified info to makers of video game, to make the game more realistic.  
Iranian jets fired on U.S. drone just days before U.S. elections  
Nestle recalling Nesquik over possible salmonella contamination  
Mayor Bloomberg orders gasoline rationing as NYC recovers from Sandy  
Jared Loughner jailed for life in fatal AZ shootings; wounding of Gabby Giffords.  
Death toll from the earthquake in #Guatemala now put at 52.  
Gabby Giffords' shooting "an assault on democracy," prosecutor says.  
NY Gov. Cuomo: Damage/loss estimates from #Sandy at $50 billion across region.  
AZ shooting victim's wife tells confessed gunman Loughner she forgives him.  
Judge rules Jared Loughner competent for sentencing in Gabby Giffords' shooting  
Former U.S. Rep. Gabrielle Giffords in court for her shooter's sentencing.  
Lawyer: Army Pfc. Manning offers guilty plea to some "offenses" in leaked files case  
Second storm puts #Sandy victims back in the dark.  
In TV interview, President al-Assad says he was made to "live and die" in #Syria.  
Nor'easter dumps snow, knocks out more power in Sandy-hit region.  
Gabrielle #Giffords to attend gunman Jared Loughner's sentencing Thursday, sources say.  
At least 29 people were killed after an #earthquake struck off Guatemala's coast.  
Hundreds of flights canceled due to #nor'easter.  
USGS: 7.5-magnitude earthquake strikes off #Guatemala  
Former Penn State president arraigned in #Sandusky scandal.  
As new storm looms, Mayor Bloomberg tells New Yorkers to stay off the road.  
French ministers back draft bill on same-sex marriage.  
Britain approves direct talks with rebels in #Syria.  
GOP Rep. Michele Bachmann of Minn. wins re-election, CNN projects #CNNElection  
Colo., Wash. state voters make marijuana legal for all uses, CNN projects. #CNNElection  
Same-sex marriage is to become legal in Maine, Maryland, CNN projects. #CNNElection  
Obama: "We are not as divided as our politics suggest." #CNNElection  
Obama: "I've never been more hopeful about our future, I've never been more hopeful about America." #CNNElection  
Obama: "More determined and more inspired than ever." #CNNElection  
Obama says he plans to sit down with Romney to talk about how they can work together. #CNNElection  
Obama: "The best is yet to come." #CNNElection  
Obama: "We rise or fall together as one nation." #CNNElection  
Obama: "The task of perfecting our union moves forward." #CNNElection  
Democratic Rep. Tammy Baldwin wins Wisc. Senate seat, CNN projects; will be 1st openly gay US senator. #CNNElection  
Romney: "I so wish that I had been able to fulfill your hopes to lead this country in a different direction.”  
Romney: This election is over but our principles endure. #CNNElection  
Obama will win battleground Virginia’s 13 electoral votes, adding to his winning tally (303; 270 needed), CNN projects.  
Obama will take battleground Colorado's 9 electoral votes, adding to his winning tally (290; 270 needed), CNN projects.  
Obama will take Nevada’s 6 electoral votes, adding to his winning tally (281, with 270 needed), CNN projects.  
Barack Obama will be re-elected president, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
President Barack Obama will win Ohio, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Romney will win Missouri’s 10 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN projections so far: Obama at 256 electoral votes, Romney at 191. Needed to win: 270. #CNNelection  
President Obama will win Oregon’s 7 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
President Obama will win New Mexico’s 5 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
President Obama will win the battleground state of Iowa and its 6 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
The Democrats will retain the majority in the U.S. Senate, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Romney will win the swing state of North Carolina and its 15 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
President Obama will win the swing state of Wisconsin and its 10 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Obama will win CA, HI, WA; Romney will win ID and MT, CNN projects #CNNelection  
Speaker Boehner: House results mean "no mandate for raising tax rates." #CNNelection  
Obama will win Minnesota’s 10 electoral votes; Romney will win Arizona’s 11 votes, CNN projects.  
Democratic Sen. Claire McCaskill will beat Todd Akin to retain her U.S. Senate seat for Missouri, CNN projects.  
President Obama will win the swing state of NH and its 4 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN projections so far: Romney at 158 electoral votes (18 states); Obama at 143 electoral votes (12 states + D.C.)  
Romney will win Utah’s 6 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Democrat Elizabeth Warren will beat Sen. Scott Brown to oust him from his U.S. Senate seat for MA, CNN projects.  
Democrat Rep. Joe Donnelly will beat Richard Mourdock for the open U.S. Senate seat for Indiana, CNN projects.  
President Obama will win Pennsylvania’s 20 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN projections so far: Romney at 152 electoral votes (17 states); Obama at 123 electoral votes (11 states plus D.C.)  
The Republican Party will retain control of the House of Representatives, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN also projects most of Nebraska’s electoral votes (at least 3 of 5) for Romney.  
CNN projects 3 more states (MI, NY, NJ) for Obama. #CNNelection  
CNN projects 7 more states (KS, LA, ND, SD, TX, WY, MS) for Romney. #CNNelection  
Romney will win Alabama’s 9 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN projections so far: Romney at 73 electoral votes (8 states); Obama at 64 electoral votes (8 states plus D.C.).  
Romney will win Arkansas’ 6 electoral votes and Tennessee’s 11 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Romney will win Georgia’s 16 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
CNN projections so far: Obama at 64 electoral votes (8 states plus D.C.); Romney at 40 electoral votes (5 states).  
CNN projects D.C. and 7 states (CT, DE, IL, ME, MD, MA, RI) for Obama, 1 (OK) for Romney. #CNNelection  
Romney will win South Carolina’s 9 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Polls close in 3 more states; Romney will win West Virginia’s 5 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Romney will win Indiana's 11 electoral votes, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
First polls close. Romney wins Kentucky, Obama wins Vermont, CNN projects. #CNNelection  
Police: Suspect, two others now dead after CA workplace shooting, police say.  
Man shoots self, kills 1, wounds 3 in CA workplace shooting, police say.  
Bombs kill 10 in Damascus suburbs, #Syria opposition group says.  
Nor'easter to bring chill to Superstorm #Sandy survivors.  
Strike shuts down #Greece ahead of austerity vote.  
Syrian generals defect to Turkey, Turkish news agency reports.  
First daytime polls open in Vermont on Election Day 2012  
Coming nor'easter prompts evacuations in seaside town of Brick, New Jersey, hit by #Sandy.  
New York governor says voters can cast ballots in any precinct. #Sandy  
Nor'easter forecast for areas already ravaged by #Sandy  
Hearing begins for U.S. soldier charged in deadly #Afghanistan shootings.  
Suspect's sister apologizes for attack on Pakistani teen activist #Malala.  
New Jersey lets #Sandy victims vote via e-mail.  
Work resumes at World Trade Center site in wake of Superstorm Sandy flooding.  
Canadian drugstore: It's too early for #Christmas tunes.  
Canadian drugstore: It's too early for #Christmas tunes.  
South Korea shuts down 2 nuclear reactors after parts scandal.  
Magnitude-2.0 quake shakes New Jersey.  
A child was killed after falling into the African painted dog exhibit area at the Pittsburgh Zoo, the zoo said.  
Nanny charged with murder in stabbing deaths of 2 children in Manhattan  
New Jersey to allow e-mail, fax ballots for voters displaced by storm  
FBI to question a suspect in Benghazi attack  
Jury finds KBR negligent in exposing soldiers to toxic chemicals in Iraq  
Sunday's New York City Marathon is canceled, Mayor Bloomberg says  
CNN/ORC poll of likely voters in Ohio: Obama 50%, Romney 47%  
NHL cancels January 1 Winter Classic outdoor hockey game  
NY Mayor Bloomberg calls on blood donors to come forward in wake of #Sandy.  
Syrian rebels blame "heinous" executions on "extremists"  
U.S. death toll from #Sandy now at 96 -- among 165 fatalities worldwide  
Donations pouring in for victims of Superstorm #Sandy  
Weather service warns cold and high winds on way for New York-New Jersey.  
Gunmen kill 18 in attack on van in Pakistan, official says  
U.N. says Hurricane #Sandy left up to 1 million in Haiti facing food shortages.  
Exclusive: #Obama, #Romney op-eds outline their visions for the next 4 years  
Areas hit by #Sandy begin sputtering back amid heartache. So far, 88 dead in U.S., 2 in Canada, 67 in Caribbean.  
U.S. official: No orders given "to stand down in providing support" in Benghazi  
Coast Guard suspends search for Robin Walbridge, captain of HMS Bounty  
3 former Penn State officials -- including ex-President Spanier -- charged in Sandusky abuse scandal  
CNN/ORC poll among likely Colorado voters: Obama 50%, Romney 48%  
The estimated U.S. death toll from #Sandy has risen to at least 81.  
Ex-Penn State pres. facing charges including perjury, conspiracy in Sandusky case.  
U.S. death toll from Superstorm #Sandy rises to at least 76.  
U.S. death toll from Superstorm #Sandy has risen to at least 68.  
U.S. death toll from #Sandy estimated at 62 -- worldwide total 131.  
More than 4.8 million customers still without power after Superstorm #Sandy.  
Springsteen, Joel among headliners for NBC Superstorm #Sandy benefit concert.  
Death toll from Superstorm #Sandy mounts -- at least 56 killed in U.S.  
3 killed in Halloween party stampede in Madrid, Spain, police say.  
Deadly fuel tanker explosion rocks Riyadh, Saudi Arabia.  
States begin to pick up the pieces from the damage left by #Sandy.  
NY Gov. Cuomo declares transportation emergency; authorizes mass transit free of charge Thursday & Friday. #Sandy  
#Sandy ruptures tank, causing 300,000 gallon diesel spill in New Jersey.  
5.5 million customers remain without power in 15 states and DC. That's down 400,000 from 6 hours ago. #Sandy  
LaGuardia Airport will reopen Thursday at 7:00 a.m. ET with limited flight schedules.
 #Sandy  
Obama tells staffers to tolerate no red tape or bureaucracy in getting help for storm victims. #Sandy  
NYC schools will be closed Thursday and Friday. #Sandy  
NY's Grand Central Terminal reopening. Commuter train service is resuming on a limited basis. #Sandy  
Bellevue Hospital in #NYC evacuating 500 remaining patients, after earlier #Sandy evacuation.  
About 5.9 million U.S. customers still without power after #Sandy -- about 300K fewer than six hours ago.  
At least 50 U.S. deaths now linked to #Sandy -- among a total of 118 worldwide.  
N.Y. Gov. Cuomo: Limited commuter rail starts Wednesday; limited #NYC subway service begins Thursday.  
At least 40 U.S deaths now linked to #Sandy -- among a total of 108 worldwide.  
At least 6.2 million customers still without power after #Sandy, officials say.  
State, local officials scramble to make sure Tuesday voting can take place despite damage from Sandy.  
JFK Airport will be open Wednesday, as will Newark Liberty International for limited service. #Sandy  
6.9 million customers are without power in 15 states and DC. That's about 1 million less than 4 hours ago. #Sandy  
Mayor Bloomberg: NYC-area death toll related to #Sandy has risen to 18.  
President #Obama will travel to New Jersey on Wednesday to view damage from #Sandy.  
Half of Hoboken, New Jersey, flooded, Mayor Dawn Zimmer tells CNN.  
29 U.S. deaths now associated with #Sandy storm system, officials say.  
About 60 people stranded on New York's Fire Island, officials say.  
Latest death toll from #Sandy is 94 overall, including 26 in the U.S.  
Storm damage to keep New York’s LaGuardia Airport shut Wednesday, N.Y. Gov. says.  
Bloomberg; Storm killed 10 in NYC. CNN U.S. toll from #Sandy at least 21.  
NY Mayor Bloomberg: More than 80 houses believed destroyed by fire in Queens  
NJ Gov. Chris Christie: Jersey Shore devastation from #Sandy "unthinkable"  
Two coalition troops killed in reported insider attack in #Afghanistan  
Superstorm #Sandy leaves more than 7 million customers without power.  
Boston transit service resuming after being shut down by Hurricane #Sandy.  
Breach in levee or dam in Bergen County, New Jersey, prompts evacuations.  
Storm chaser Reed Timmer: Snow from #Sandy falling 3-4 inches per hour near Elkins, West Virginia.  
It will take up to 4 days to get flood water out of NY subway tunnels, a Metro Transit Authority spokesman says  #Sandy 
6,535,896: That's the number of customers without power across 13 states and Washington D.C.#Sandy  
Blizzard spawned by #Sandy expected to bring 3 feet of snow to WV mountains, 2 feet to parts of Va. and up to 18 inches to Tenn.-N.C.border. 
U.S. death toll rises to 13 after 8-year-old boy dies after he was struck by tree limb in Susquehanna County, Pennsylvania #Sandy 
New power outage numbers: 5.5 million customers in 13 states and Washington D.C., according to a CNN tally. #Sandy  
Major fire reported in the Rockaway Park area of Queens, New York #Sandy  
Backup power at NYU Langone Medical Center has failed. Hospital is evacuating all patients now. #Sandy  
New York’s Bellevue Hospital Center has flooded basement, using emergency backup power, but no injuries reported  #Sandy 
U.S. death toll rises to 12. A 62-year-old man killed by a falling tree in Oley, Penn, according to Penn. State Police  
At least 5.3 million people without power across 11 states affected by Superstorm Sandy, according to a CNN tally  
Half the city of Hoboken, New Jersey, is flooded, said Mayor Dawn Zimmer. The city of 50,000 has had to evacuate two of its fire stations 
#Sandy death toll update: 11 dead in United States, 1 in Canada  
Waters starting to recede in western Long Island Sound, National Weather Service says #Sandy  
About 200 patients being evacuated from NYU medical center, which is on backup power.  
Water is entering New York's subway system from the East River, but pumps are working. #Sandy.  
2 deaths in NJ, 1 in CT, 1 in WVA, 1 off NC coast, in addition to 5 deaths in NY due to #Sandy.  
Kennedy, Newark Liberty and Teterboro airports have been closed due to #Sandy flooding.  
Con Ed: Power outage in downtown Manhattan has taken out "almost everything
from 39th Street on down." #Sandy  
5 people have been killed in New York, including a man hit by tree while inside his Queens home. #Sandy  
Due to floodwaters generated by #Sandy, the Port Authority has closed
LaGuardia Airport until further notice.  
#Sandy made landfall along the coast of southern New Jersey, the National
Hurricane Center said.  
Water levels in the Battery in Manhattan have gone 1 foot higher than the previous record set in 1960. #Sandy  
More than 2.2 million customers are without power in 11 states and the District of Columbia. #Sandy  
National Hurricane Center: #Sandy is now a post-tropical storm.  
Deckhand missing from HMS #Bounty has been found "unresponsive" after vessel foundered in #Hurricane #Sandy.  
More than 1.5 million customers are without power due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
Brooklyn, Manhattan, Williamsburg and Queensboro bridges in New York will shut at 7 p.m. #HurricaneSandy  
All federal government offices in and around Washington will be closed Tuesday. #HurricaneSandy  
U.S. markets to remain closed Tuesday due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
More than 765,000 in 7 states have no electricity, with NY and NJ being most affected. #HurricaneSandy  
New York's Tappan Zee Bridge will be closed beginning at 4 p.m. ET due
to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
Hurricane #Sandy shaping up as record-breaking storm.  
Obama declares state of emergency for #Delaware as Hurricane #Sandy hits.  
President Obama says millions will be impacted by powerful Hurricane #Sandy.  
Thousands in 7 states now without power as Hurricane #Sandy slams East Coast.  
Hundreds being evacuated from west Atlantic City, county official says.  
President Obama set to make Hurricane #Sandy statement at 12:45 p.m. ET.  
Weather service reports 24-foot seas off New Jersey ahead of Hurricane #Sandy  
U.S. violent crime down for fifth straight year, FBI says.  
Coast Guard rescues 14 HMS Bounty crew members from lifeboats; 2 still missing.  
Hurricane #Sandy intensifies -- with sustained winds now reaching 90 mph.  
Public transit in Boston to be suspended at 2 p.m. ET ahead of Hurricane #Sandy.  
Power officials now say Hurricane #Sandy could impact 60 million people.  
3.9-magnitude earthquake strikes northeastern Arkansas.  
Conn. Gov. Malloy: Hurricane #Sandy tides could cause "unprecedented damage."  
Hurricane #Sandy grounds thousands of flights worldwide.  
Hurricane #Sandy storm conditions extend to Lake Michigan, weather service says  
Crew of HMS Bounty abandoned ship 90 miles off Hatteras, NC, Coast Guard says.  
Report: Crew of sailing ship HMS Bounty abandons vessel 190 miles off N.Carolina.  
Freight train derails in Kentucky, sparking hazardous materials alert.  
Car bomb in Damascus suburb kills at least 10 people, #Syria State TV reports.  
45 outbound flights to U.S. East Coast from London's Heathrow Airport have been canceled. Twelve inbound flights have been scrubbed. #Sandy 
Hurricane #Sandy strengthens with winds of 85 mph, National Hurricane Center says  
National Hurricane Center says #Sandy is making its turn to the north. Forecast map shows the storm hitting the Jersey shore Monday night. 
San Francisco Giants win World Series, beating the Detroit Tigers 4-3 to sweep the series in four games. 
NY Port Authority Bus Terminal will suspend all service by early Monday morning. #HurricaneSandy  
President Obama declares emergency in Washington ahead of #Hurricane #Sandy.  
President Obama declares states of emergency in New York and Massachusetts due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
The Metro in Washington, D.C., will close on Monday due to Hurricane Sandy,  
Federal offices in Washington, DC area will be closed Monday due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
#SpaceX Dragon completes 1st commercial cargo flight, splashing down in Pacific Ocean.  
The NYSE will suspend physical trading and floor operations on Monday
due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
School canceled for about 2 million students in 7 states and D.C. due to #Hurricane #Sandy.  
Millions of people could experience flash flooding or river flooding from #Sandy, head of hurricane center says.  
NYC stopping subway, bus, train service as Hurricane #Sandy nears.  
British police arrest man on suspicion of sexual offenses in Jimmy Savile investigation.  
Tsunami warning for Hawaii has been canceled. A tsunami advisory is now in effect.  
4th small tsunami wave coming ashore in Hawaii. No apparent damage.  
7.7-magnitude quake off Canada's coast triggers tsunami warning. Follow the live blog here:  
Motorist wounded in latest random shooting in southeast Michigan  
R&B singer Natina Reed struck and killed by vehicle, police say  
Terrorist group was plotting to hit U.S. Consulate in East Java, Indonesian police say  
Sandy has re-strengthened to hurricane status, the National Hurricane Center says.  
Al Qaeda leader calls for kidnapping of Westerners.  
At least 15 dead in wave of attacks in Iraq on second day of Eid al-Adha festival.  
Police: The nanny suspected in deaths of 2 young children stabbed herself when children's mother came in.  
S.C. taxpayer server hacked, 3.6 million Social Security numbers compromised  
FDA: Drug company told of contamination months before meningitis outbreak  
Sen. Harry Reid released from hospital with hip and rib bruises after car wreck  
Hospital reports Sen. Harry Reid in good condition after car wreck  
Sen. Harry Reid, 72, taken to hospital after car crash, Nevada Hwy Patrol says  
More games canceled amid #NHL lockout.  
Former Chinese leader Bo Xilai faces criminal investigation.  
More Lance Armstrong fallout: No winners for Tour de France from '98 to '05.  
"All clear" given after evacuation at Canadian Embassy in Washington.  
Ex-Italian PM #Berlusconi sentenced to 4 years in prison in tax evasion case.  
Canadian Embassy in Washington evacuated, police say.  
30+ dead in suicide blast outside Afghan mosque where worshipers were finishing prayers.  
Hurricane Sandy has left 21 dead, is likely to merge into #Frankenstorm, ravage New England.  
11 people in #Cuba have died due to #Hurricane Sandy, state news reported.  
Famed boxing trainer Emanuel Steward dies in Chicago.  
Hurricane Sandy 25 miles from Great Exuma Island, in Bahamas.  
Report: NBA Commissioner David Stern stepping down.  
The parents of #Taliban attack victim #Malala arrive in UK to visit daughter.  
Police search for suspects after airman shot at New Mexico Air Force Base annex.  
Hurricane Sandy nearing Bahamas with maximum sustained winds of 105 mph.  
Syrian government to suspend military action starting Friday morning, state TV reports.  
Man convicted of leaking pope's papers heads to jail.  
2 U.S. troops killed in Afghanistan insider attack, military source says.  
Hurricane Sandy now moving toward the Bahamas, hurricane center says.  
Family of Malala -- Pakistani girl shot by Taliban -- to visit her at UK hospital.  
Upon further review, #HurricaneSandy is not quite a Cat. 3. It's a strong Cat. 2. Top sustained winds 110 mph.  
Hurricane Sandy makes landfall in Cuba as a Category 3 with winds of 115 mph.  
beat 8-3 in Game 1 of #WorldSeries. Pablo Sandoval hits 3 HRs.  #KungFuPanda 
US Intel believes some #Benghazi attackers tied to al Qaeda in Iraq.  
Bobby Brown arrested again on DUI charge.  #BobbyBrown 
#Hurricane Sandy hits #Jamaica with 80-mph wind.  
Ex-Goldman director Rajat Gupta gets two years for insider trading.  #RajGupta 
Arrest made by Colorado police in Jessica Ridgeway murder investigation.  
Kennedy nephew Skakel denied parole in 1975 beating death.  
Man shot at Creflo Dollar's Georgia megachurch has died, police say.  
Car bomb explodes in Damascus, Syrian state news agency reports.  
Sandy now a Category 1 #hurricane as it eyes Jamaica, hurricane center says.  
One shot at Creflo Dollar's Georgia megachurch.  
Police chief resigns amid questions over UK soccer stadium disaster.  
Police: Arrests made in attack on Malala -- Pakistani girl who stood up to Taliban.  
France's biggest rogue trader to serve 3-year prison term.  
3 killed, kids hurt in suspected U.S. drone strike in #Pakistan  
Syrian government agrees to cease-fire during Muslim holiday, U.N. envoy says.  
Israeli airstrikes into Gaza have killed 3 Palestinians, after rocket attacks from Gaza into Israel.  
A Utah man accused of raping 4 women has been found dead in his cabin of an apparent suicide.  
Compounding pharmacy linked to meningitis outbreak subject of criminal probe  
Scientists quit Italy govt. posts after colleagues get prison for failing to predict quake  
Principal reports high school boys created 'Fantasy Slut League'  
Facebook shares jump 8% on modestly positive earnings report  
Dow, sliding more than 240 points, closes at seven-week low.  
Arrests made in death of 12-year-old New Jersey girl.  
Miami fire manager Ozzie Guillen  
Former CIA officer pleads guilty to revealing identity of covert intelligence officer.  
BBC chief defends handling of sex abuse scandal.  
Dozens reported killed in attack on #Syria bakery.  
Lawyer files for emergency stay of execution for Florida man who killed 8.  
New UK phone-hacking claims target Mirror group newspapers, lawyer says  
Wife told court Wisconsin shooter would kill her.  
Vatican puts off #Syria trip, citing "gravity of situation" in that country.  
Giants win NLCS, will face Tigers in #WorldSeries.  
Moderator ends quoting his mom: Go vote. It makes you feel big and strong.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: 23 million Americans struggling to find a good job; 70 million people on food stamps. It hasn’t worked.  
Romney: I’m a son of Detroit. I like American cars. I would do nothing to hurt the American auto industry.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: You are familiar w/ jobs being shipped overseas because you’ve invested in companies that shipped jobs overseas.  
Romney: We can work with China, if they're willing to be responsible.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: China is both adversary and potential partner, if they are playing by the rules.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: In Tunisia, Egypt, Libya, we stood on the side of the people.  #CNNdebate 
#CNNdebate  RT Romney on Afghanistan: We'll make sure we bring our troops out by 2014. 
Obama tells Romney, problem is on a whole range of issues, you’ve been all over the map.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: We’re four years closer to a nuclear Iran. We should not have wasted these four years.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: Nothing Romney said is true, starting with me supposedly apologizing.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: Iran has looked at this administration and they’ve seen weakness:  #CNNdebate 
Obama: Iran can re-enter community of nations. The deal we would accept is they end their nuclear program.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: If Israel is attacked, we have their back.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: As long as I’m president of the United States, Iran will not get a nuclear weapon.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: Fewer ships than 1916? We also have fewer horses and bayonets.  #CNNdebate 
Romney on Pentagon budget: I want to make sure we have the ships that are required by our Navy.  #CNNdebate 
Obama to Romney: The policies you’re promoting don’t help small businesses.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: What the president has done in the last four years I don’t want to repeat in next four years.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: America remains the one indispensable nation. America is stronger now than when I came into office.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: We've weakened our economy...no where in world is US influence greater than it was 4 years ago.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: While nation building in Iraq and Afghanistan, we’ve neglected infrastructure at home.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: These countries can’t develop if young women are not provided the education they need.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: Seeing Assad removed is high priority. Making sure new leaders see us as friends is, too.  #CNNdebate 
Obama on Syria: heavy weapons to the opposition will not make us safer in the long term.  #CNNdebate 
Romney's response: "Attacking me is not an agenda."  #CNNdebate 
Obama tells Romney, on Afghanistan not only were you wrong, but you were sending a confusing message.  #CNNdebate 
Romney mentions Mali again, adding: we’ve got real problems in the region.  #CNNdebate 
Obama to Romney: Your strategy has been all over the map and is not designed to keep Americans safe.  #CNNdebate 
Romney, in answer to question about Libya and terror: We can’t kill our way out of this mess.  #CNNdebate 
Every president faces an unexpected threat from abroad, notes as debate gets under way.  #CNNdebate 
LA coroner: Director Tony Scott had anti-depressant and sleep aid in system before death.  #tonyscott 
Tropical Storm Sandy churning toward #Jamaica.  #tropicalstormsandy 
No jail for student in #FAMU hazing death.  
FBI to join investigation of deadly Lebanon car bombing.  
Insurance company wants Lance Armstrong performance bonus money back.  
Suspected gunman's wife among Wisconsin shooting victims, records state.  
Lebanese intelligence chief aware of threat before death, source says.  
All 19 aboard helicopter are accounted for after water landing, source says.  
Helicopter carrying 19 makes emergency water landing.  
Native American activist Russell Means dies, tribal representative says.  
Poll of Polls showing dead heat for Obama, Romney  
Sponsor Oakley ends its long-standing relationship with Lance Armstrong  
"Armstrong has no place in cycling," cycling union chief Pat McQuaid says.  
International Cycling Union strips Lance Armstrong of 7 Tour de France titles.  
Body in burned California home was wearing armor and holding a handgun, police say.  
55 people injured after floor of Florida apartment building collapses.
 
The suspected gunman in the shooting at a Brookfield, Wisconsin, spa has been found dead, police said.  
Three people are believed dead after a shooting at a spa in Brookfield, Wisconsin, police said.  
Fidel Castro "is doing very well," Venezuela's former VP says, showing a photo he says is from this weekend.  
At least seven people are injured in a shooting in Brookfield, Wisconsin, a hospital spokeswoman says.  
Pope names 1st Native American saint and 6 other saints, including nun who devoted life to helping lepers in Hawaii.  
Former U.S. Sen. George McGovern has died, according to a family statement. He was 90.  
Police find body in burned California home after family killings.  
Gunman at large in California after shooting family, killing two.  
Derek Jeter undergoes surgery to mend ankle he fractured fielding a ground ball last weekend.  
Hong Kong seizes more than 8,000 lbs. of ivory worth $26.7 million.  
Israeli navy boards ship attempting to break sea blockade of Gaza.  
The Israeli navy says it has boarded a ship bound for Gaza in defiance of Israel's blockade.  
New research shows that boys are hitting puberty earlier than in the past. Various possible causes are suspected.  
Some donors to Lance Armstrong's #Livestrong group say they want their money back, after USADA's doping report.  
Lance #Armstrong speaks at #Livestrong event days after stepping down amid doping scandal.  
CNN/ORC Poll: 49% of likely Florida voters support Romney; 48% support Obama.  
Correction: U.S. stocks post biggest one-day percentage loss since June  
Dow skids 206 points in worst one-day percentage drop since March.  
Senior security official believed among #Lebanon bombing victims, source says.  
Envoy in #Syria seeking cease-fire by Muslim holiday next week.  
Envoy in #Syria seeking cease-fire by Muslim holiday next week.  
Eight killed and 78 hurt in Beirut car bomb blast, Lebanese news agency reports.  
Car bomb causes massive blast in Beirut, state news agency says.  
Taliban shooting victim Malala Yousufzai "communicating freely," doctor says.  
After attack on #Malala, Pakistani Taliban tries to stifle criticism of the shooting, by threatening journalists.  
#Tigers sweep #Yankees, head to World Series.  #ALCS #WorldSeries 
Mother of 'Baby Gabriel' found guilty of imprisonment, custodial interference.  #babygabriel 
Man behind "Jailbait" posts exposed; says he made a "huge mistake."  
Jerry Sandusky's lawyers appeal conviction. / #Sandusky 
Boy Scouts on alleged sex abuse documents released: "Nothing is more important than the safety of our #scouts,"  
Lawyers release Boy Scouts files on alleged child sex abusers  
Three men arrested after five found dead in Denver bar fire.  
Afghan woman beheads daughter-in-law for refusing prostitution, police say.  
Rockets kill residents on street in Syria, neighbor says.  
Thousands rally as #Greece transport system snarled by anti-austerity strike.  
Blast near Syrian intelligence building rocks Damascus suburb, group says.  
11 killed -- including many children -- in landslide in Peru.  
With rampant speculation about his health, Cuba released a message from Fidel Castro, 86. No new photos.  
Amid much speculation about Fidel Castro's health, #Cuba state media releases message from him.  #Castro 
Flavor Flav arrested on assault, battery charges.  #FlavorFlav 
Police: 5 found dead after #Denver bar fire.  
4 more deaths in #meningitis outbreak.  
Man arrested in Federal Reserve terror plot.  #terrorism 
Man accused of plotting to kill Saudi ambassador to U.S. pleads guilty.  
3 killed in Kenya tourist city grenade attack  
Violent crime up for first time in almost two decades, Justice Department says.  
Trial of George Zimmerman in Trayvon Martin killing set for June 10, attorney says.  
UK man charged over photographers' kidnapping in #Syria  
Scandal-hit Armstrong quits as #Livestrong chair to spare it "negative effects"  
Nike says it has ended its contract with Lance #Armstrong  
Lance Armstrong to quit as chairman of #Livestrong cancer charity, source says.  
#CNNpoll: Obama won 2nd presidential debate by narrow margin.  
Obama: Government creates jobs? That's not what I believe.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: Some jobs aren’t coming back – low-skill, low-wage jobs. Romney: Government does not create jobs.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: We can compete with anyone in the world as long as playing field is level. China has been cheating.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: I want to close loopholes that allow companies to move jobs offshore. Romney wants to expand those tax breaks.  
Romney: I will label China a currency manipulator. We are going to make sure people we trade with play by the rules.
 
Q on guns. Obama: Need to enforce laws we have. Also see if we can get assault weapons ban introduced.  #CNNdebate 
#CNNdebate RT Obama: The suggestion that anyone in my team would play politics or mislead...is offensive. 
Romney: Right after the Libya attack, our president flew across country for campaign events.  #CNNdebate 
#CNNDebate RT Asked about consulate security in Libya, Obama: "We are going to find out who did this and hunt them down." 
Romney goes off topic and says Obama's pension fund invests in offshore companies. tells him to sit down. #CNNdebate 
Obama on undocumented immigrants: Need to go after criminals, gangbangers, not after students.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: Need to help legal immigrants. Would not give driver's licenses to those who immigrated illegally.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: Obama said he'd cut deficit in half, but he doubled it.  #CNNdebate 
Obama, on 1st term: Created 5 million jobs, saved auto industry. Are you struggling? We have more to do.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: I have two daughters. I want to make sure they have the same opportunities that anybody’s sons have.  #CNNdebate 
Q on pay for women. Obama: I signed Lilly Ledbetter act. Talks about lowering college costs for young women.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: Of course it adds up. How about his $4 trillion deficits? I know what it takes to balance budgets.  #CNNdebate 
Obama: Cost of lowering rates is $5 trillion. We haven’t heard any specifics about how he pays for that.  #CNNdebate 
Romney promises no taxes on interest, dividends, capital gains for middle-class families.  #CNNdebate 
Q on taxes. Romney: I want middle-income taxpayers to have lower taxes. Middle-income families have been crushed in last 4 years. #CNNdebate 
Obama: Romney could bring down prices, but that’s because we would be back in that same mess.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: If the president's energy policies are working, you're going to see the price of energy come down.  #CNNdebate 
O: That's what we're going to do in the next 4 years. R: But that's not what you did in the last 4 years.  #CNNdebate 
Romney on energy: More drilling, more permits, bring pipeline from Canada. This is about good jobs.  #CNNdebate 
Q2: Job of Energy Dept to lower gas prices? Obama: I’m working to expand drilling, but we also need efficient energy to keep prices lower. 
Romney defends bankruptcy as a way of improving auto industry. Obama says 'just isn't true'  #CNNdebate 
Obama: My jobs plan includes better education, retraining workers, investment in energy, building roads.  #CNNdebate 
Romney: It's not going to be like the last four years...I'm going to make sure you get a job.  #CNNdebate 
1st Q, from student: What can you say to reassure me that I will be able to support myself after I graduate?  #CNNdebate 
Shooting prompts #Canada to close a border crossing with #Washington state.  
A preliminary magnitude 4.6 #earthquake hit near Hollis Center, Maine at 7:12 p.m. EST. 
 
Nine million thanks to our followers! The account has hit the 9 million mark. Digital hugs to all of you. Now back to breaking news. 
Israeli parliament dissolves, schedules early election.  #Israel 
Senegal national soccer team disqualified from 2013 Africa Cup of Nations.  
Picasso, Matisse paintings and more stolen from Netherlands museum.  
Former Bosnian Serb leader Radovan Karadzic on trial for genocide.  
UK won't extradite accused Pentagon hacker to U.S. because of health concerns.  
#Cuba easing some travel restrictions. Next year, no travel permit required for citizens to go abroad.  
Former presidential nominee and Sen. George #McGovern has been admitted to a hospice in Sioux Falls, SD.  
Paul becomes major #hurricane with sustained winds of 120 mph as it nears Mexico.  
Hillary #Clinton: 'I take responsibility' for what happened in #Benghazi.  
Pakistani teen shot by Taliban lands in UK for treatment.  
Captain in Italian shipwreck disaster faces survivors in court.  
Alvin Roth of Harvard and Lloyd Shapley of UCLA win Nobel Prize in economics.  
Malala Yousufzai, the Pakistani schoolgirl shot in the head by the Taliban, is on her way to Britain for treatment  
Syrian troops reclaim historic 12th Century #mosque. UNESCO urges all parties not to damage it further in battle.  
Libyan assembly selects new prime minister, a week after ousting earlier pick.  #libya 
Skydiver #Felix Baumgartner broke the speed of sound -- at one point hitting Mach 1.24, team official says.  
Obama "has to be more energetic" in Tuesday's debate, Obama adviser Robert Gibbs says on CNN's "State of the Union."  
Skydiver #Felix Baumgartner lands safely on Earth after free fall from stratosphere.  
Skydiver Felix Baumgartner begins his free fall from about 128,000 feet.  
Arlen Specter died of complications from non-Hodgkin Lymphoma, family says.  
Former U.S. Sen. Arlen Specter of Pennsylvania has died, his family said. He was 82.  
Skydiver #Felix Baumgartner lifts off as he begins attempt at record-breaking free fall from stratosphere.  
At least 18 people killed as they were leaving Nigeria mosque, village chief says.  
Troops open fire on president of Mauritania's convoy, state news reports  
Trees, utility poles slow shuttle Endeavour's road trip through Los Angeles  
Body of University of Florida student missing since Sept. 20 found, father says  
Tropical Storm Rafael forecast to strengthen as it nears Caribbean tourism areas  
Talks between NHL and players over lockout to resume Tuesday, source says  
Actor and TV host Gary Collins has died at age 74.  
Painting from Eric Clapton's collection auctioned for record $34 million.  
Police make more arrests in shooting of teen girl by Taliban. More than 200 have been arrested; 35 still held.  
Body in concrete identified as missing former reporter  
Playoff result: CC Sabathia leads Yankees past O's in deciding game of ALDS  
Police: Body found in field is Jessica Ridgeway, 10, missing since October 5  
Mom who glued toddler to wall then beat her is sentenced to 99 years  
VP debate fact check: Will 20M lose health coverage?  
According to the #CNNDebateClock, Biden spoke for 41:32 minutes; Ryan clocked in at 40:12. #cnndebate  
Biden: The next president will get one or two Supreme Court nominees. That’s how close Roe v. Wade is. #cnndebate  
Biden says he believes life begins at conception, but he says he refuses to impose that on others. #cnndebate  
Ryan: Romney policy will be to oppose abortion except in cases of rape, incest or life of the mother. #cnndebate  
Ryan: Nobody is proposing to send American troops to Syria. #cnndebate  
On Syria, Biden says the last thing America needs is to get in another ground war in the Middle East. #cnndebate  
Ryan on deadline: “We don’t want to broadcast to our enemies: Put a date on your calendar. Wait us out.” #cnndebate  
On Afghanistan, Biden says, “We are leaving. We are leaving in 2014. Period.” #cnndebate  
Asked why not leave Afghanistan now, Ryan says, “We don’t want to lose the gains we have gotten.” #cnndebate  
Biden: Middle class will pay less taxes under Obama; people making $1 million+ will pay more. #cnndebate  
Biden: “We will be no part of a voucher program or the privatization of Social Security.” #cnndebate  
Ryan: They got caught with their hands in the cookie jar turning Medicare into a piggy bank for Obamacare. #cnndebate  
Biden says Obama administration can get unemployment under 6%. Ryan says economy is “barely limping along.” #cnndebate  
Ryan says Obama administration “watered down sanctions” on Iran. Biden replies, “Incredible.” #cnndebate  
Ryan says we are watching the “unraveling of the Obama foreign policy.” #cnndebate  
Vice President Joe Biden and Rep. Paul Ryan take the stage for their first and only debate. #cnndebate  
Vice President Joe Biden and Rep. Paul Ryan arrive at Newlin Hall in Danville, Kentucky, for the VP debate.  
NL playoff result: Jason Werth's HR in bottom of 9th leads Washington past St. Louis  
High school freshman apologizes in front of class, then shoots himself  
7 Royal Marines arrested in 2011 Afghanistan murder case  
NL playoff result: San Francisco wins divisional series over Cincinnati  
Hezbollah claims it sent Iranian-made drone into Israeli airspace last week  
Oxygen deprivation killed giant panda cub, zoo says.  
Suspected U.S. drone strike kills 16 in Pakistan.  
Security official for U.S. Embassy in Yemen killed.  
Writer Mo Yan of China wins Nobel Prize in literature.  
U.S. sends troops to Jordan to help monitor Syria's chemical weapons.  
A Fla. college says data breach compromised info of more than 200,000 students and employees.  
Lance #Armstrong teammates recount dodging, tricking drug testers.  
Idaho dairy fires 5 workers in animal abuse video.  
Letters by #Sandusky, wife blame everyone else.  
Lance #Armstrong part of "sophisticated" doping operation, watchdog group says.  
2 arrested at London airport in terror probe with links to #Syria  
Former NFL star, actor Alex #Karras dies, family spokesman says.  
2 American researchers win #Nobel Prize for Chemistry for work concerning "fight or flight" response.  
Doctors have removed bullet from neck of #Malala Yousufzai, the teen girl shot after blogging against Taliban.  
Pakistan's top court investigates alleged use of girls to settle tribal dispute.  
NFL confirms suspensions for 4 in #Saints bounty scandal.  
CNN/ORC Poll: Obama 51%; Romney 47% in battleground Ohio.  #CNNElection 
Deaths rise to 11 in rare meningitis outbreak.  
Skydive attempt from stratosphere is aborted, commentator for event sponsor says.  
Historic free-fall from stratosphere back on schedule. Balloon set to take off shortly.  
Armed men steal body of slain Zetas leader from Mexican funeral home, says state attorney general.  
Mexican military confirms it killed Heriberto Lazcano Lazcano, leader of Zetas drug cartel.  
One #Sandusky victim testified: "I became a social outcast. I didn’t know how to process (what you did to me).”  
#Sandusky attorneys to appeal, say they needed more time to prepare defense.  
One victim of #Sandusky told court: "The sentence will never erase what he did to me."  
#Sandusky repeated in court multiple times, “I did not do these disgusting acts.”  
#Sandusky sentence: No less than 30 years, no more than 60 years with credit for time served.  
Sandusky attorneys won't challenge sexually violent predator classification.  
Massive explosions reported in #Syria near Damascus air force compound.  
U.S., French scientists win #Nobel Prize in Physics for work on quantum systems.  
#Florida man dies after winning #roach-eating contest  
Jerry #Sandusky proclaims his innocence in jailhouse audio recording.  
#SpaceX reviews engine failure, but Dragon on course for International Space Station.  
Second straight poll suggests debate bump for Romney -  
Jerry #Sandusky plans to speak at sentencing hearing, attorney says.  
Death toll in meningitis outbreak linked to steroid injections now 8, CDC says.  
Police arrest 13 in videotaped killings in Nigeria.  
Suspect arrested in Falcon Lake killing, Mexican authorities say.  
John B. Gurdon and Shinya Yamanaka win 2012 #NobelPrize for medicine 
Venezuelan President Hugo #Chavez wins another 6-year term, partial results say from the National Electoral Council.  
The #SpaceX rocket, the first commercial flight to the ISS, has launched carrying an unmanned cargo capsule.  
Maker of steroid linked to meningitis outbreak recalls all of its products  
"Any future attack on Turkey from anywhere will be silenced," foreign minister warns  
Campus police officer shoots, kills naked student  
7 dead as meningitis outbreak grows to 64 people in nine states  
Man charged with murder and abduction of missing Wales girl.  
Israel shoots down drone; not clear where it originated.  
Pope's former butler sentenced to 18 months for leaking confidential papers.  
MLB denies Braves' protest over infield fly rule call in playoff loss to Cardinals  
St. Louis Cardinals beat Atlanta Braves, 6-3, to win single-game wildcard playoff  
Cardinals-Braves playoff game delayed due to angry fans throwing debris on field  
Border agent's death likely due to friendly fire, FBI says  
Workers strike over iPhone 5 demands, labor group says  
12 more patients linked to fungal meningitis infections, CDC says  
At least 29 hurt in pileup involving as many as 50 vehicles on I-75 in Florida  
FBI investigating possibility that border agent's death was due to friendly fire  
Dissident Cuban blogger arrested, colleagues say.  
Thousands protest for political change in #Jordan.  
Court: Radical cleric Abu Hamza al-Masri to be extradited to U.S. on terror charges.  
U.S. man fatally shoots hotel worker in Israel, police say.  
NYC demands footage from Ken Burns on film he made about Central Park 5.  
Romney says he was "completely wrong" in his comment about the 47%.  
Bodies of 18 children found after a landslide buries Chinese elementary school  
California parole board recommends parole for Manson follower convicted of murder  
Patients in 23 states possibly exposed to medications linked to meningitis outbreak  
The NHL cancels all regular-season games through Oct. 24 amid labor dispute  
Drone strikes kill 5 suspected al Qaeda fighters in Yemen, officials say.  
#Iran arrests 16 "main players" in currency crisis.  
U.N. secretary general calls on #Syria and #Turkey to exercise "maximum restraint"  
Miguel Cabrera of Detroit Tigers wins triple crown; first since Yaz in 1967  
1st debate ends: Obama closes with goals for future. Romney says Obama will cut military spending.  #CNNDebate 
On role of government, Romney says what we have now is trickle-down government and we know it’s not working. #CNNdebate 
Romney: I lay out the principles. I work with lawmakers to follow those principles to develop legislation.  #CNNDebate 
Obama: Romney provides few details. He says he’s going to replace Obamacare, and you don’t have to worry.  #CNNDebate 
Romney on health care costs: In my opinion, government is not effective at bringing down the cost of almost anything. #CNNDebate 
Commissioner: Philadelphia cop seen on video striking parade-goer faces dismissal  
Obama: Does anyone think the problem is we had too much regulation of Wall Street?  #CNNDebate 
Romney: Dodd Frank has provisions harmful to the economy. Designating banks too big to fail is an enormous kiss to banks. #CNNDebate 
Q: What is your view of federal regulation of the economy?  #CNNDebate 
Obama: If you repeal Obamacare, those seniors will be paying $600 more and insurance companies will gain billions of dollars. #CNNDebate 
Romney: Tax breaks for businesses that go overseas? I don't know what you're talking about.  #CNNDebate 
Obama: Does anyone think that Exxon Mobil needs extra money?  #CNNDebate 
Romney on portion of total spending that goes to government: I don't want to go down the path of Spain.  #CNNDebate 
Romney: You raise taxes and you kill jobs. I don't want to kill jobs in this environment.  #CNNDebate 
Obama on debt: I worked with D’s and R’s to cut $1 trillion on domestic budget. We have to do more.  #CNNDebate 
Q: Differences on debt? Romney: Not just economic issue, it's a moral issue.  #CNNDebate 
Romney: You may keep referring to it as a $5 trillion tax cut, but that’s not my plan.  #CNNDebate 
Obama: For 18 months he's been running on this tax plan, and now he says his big bold idea is 'never mind' -  #CNNDebate 
Obama: I said I would cut taxes for middle-class families and that's just what I did.  #CNNDebate

 ForrestBrownCNN 
Romney: No tax cut that adds to the deficit. Says it twice.  #CNNDebate 
Romney says middle-income Americans are just crushed, adding electricity, food, health care costs are up.  #CNNDebate 
First Q: What are the major differences between you and your opponent about how you would create jobs?  #CNNDebate 
Jim Lehrer, moderator, sets expectations for the presidential debate in Denver, starting at 9 ET:  #CNNDebate 
Outbreak of rare form of meningitis spreads to 5 states; 4 dead  
NATO convenes urgent meeting over Turkey-Syria hostilities  
Turkey strikes targets inside Syria in retaliation for shelling deaths  
Report: Shell fired from #Syria kills 3 in Turkey border town.  
4 peacekeepers dead in attack on U.N. mission in Darfur.  
Dozens killed in car bombings in Aleppo, #Syria  
Protests over plummeting currency break out in #Iran  
American Airlines says another flight has experienced loose seats, bringing the total to three flights in a week.  
A Border Patrol agent was shot and killed while on duty Tuesday, and another was wounded near Naco, Arizona.  
Plane carrying Vice President Joe Biden twice forced to abort landings Tuesday  
Adam Greenberg, hit by pitch in 2005, gets another at-bat with Marlins  
Alcohol enema "never happened," Tennessee student says  
U.S. gathers information about possible militant targets in Libya  
Soil tests show no evidence of human remains in Jimmy Hoffa search  
Judge blocks Pennsylvania voter ID law for November election  
Killing of Border Patrol agent in Arizona is third of its kind this year.  
Philadelphia police officer videotaped striking a woman is identified, placed on administrative leave.  
Man arrested in disappearance of still-missing girl, 5, in Wales.  
French prosecutor drops investigation into Strauss-Kahn's connection to possible gang rape in Washington.  
Georgian president concedes his party lost parliamentary election to coalition headed by billionaire, officials say.  
Death toll up to 36 in ferry crash off the coast of Hong Kong.  
Police arrest second suspect in St. Maarten killings of American couple.  
6.2-magnitude #earthquake strikes off Japan's eastern coast.  
Ferry, tug collide off Hong Kong, killing 25 passengers.  
#Amtrak train collides with big rig; 30 hurt.  
Setback for Pakistani teen facing blasphemy charges  
Syria F.M.: Calls for President Bashar al-Assad to step down are a "blatant interference in the domestic affairs"  
Syrian F.M. tells U.N. some countries are pursuing "new colonial policies" under guise of humanitarian efforts  
Indianapolis Colts head coach Chuck Pagano diagnosed with leukemia, owner Jim Irsay says.  
Europe retains the Ryder Cup with historic rally over the U.S. in Sunday singles.  #RyderCup 
A coalition service member and a civilian contractor were killed Saturday in a suspected attack by an Afghan soldier, ISAF said. 
U.S. has big lead heading into Ryder Cup finale.  
Authorities in Tennessee asking for public's help to find two kids presumed missing after a fire destroyed their home.  
Police: Backpack of missing University of Florida student found at home of suspect; blood detected in car.  
New York Times says former publisher Arthur Ochs Sulzberger has died at 86  
#Reds' Homer Bailey pitches no-hitter in win over #Pirates; it is the season's 7th.  
Months before his death, "Sons of Anarchy" actor suspected in killing was considered a threat.  
Intel community revises assessment, calls #Libya consulate attack a terrorist assault.  
#Louisiana man freed after 15 years on death row for murder he didn't commit.  
Connecticut teacher mistakenly kills his son after neighbor reports robbery.  
Chemical weapons moved in Syria, Defense Secretary Leon Panetta says.  
Stay of execution issued for convicted killer Terrance Williams.  
Soil samples taken in new hunt for Jimmy Hoffa remains.  
At least 15 reported killed in #Iraq jailbreak.  
Defamation lawsuit against John Travolta and his attorney has been dismissed.  
#NFL referees get big cheer taking field for first game back after lockout.  
Producer of anti-Islam film arrested in California, appears in court for bail hearing.  
Landlady's death blamed on head trauma, strangulation; "Sons of Anarchy" actor killed in fall suspected.  
Obama, Romney shift presidential battleground to Virginia.  
NFL, regular referees agree on contract to get them back on field tonight.  
Wednesday's death toll in #Syria 343, worst of war, opposition says.  
Sources: Site of #Libya consulate attack still not secure.  
New search for body of Jimmy #Hoffa in suburban Detroit.  
Four guards reported killed in rebel attack on military headquarters in #Syria.  
U.S. delegation will not attend U.N. speech by Iran's Ahmadinejad.  
Singer Andy Williams dies at 84.  
Two explosions rock military building in Damascus, Syria.  
Holland America cruise ship fails health inspection.  
6.2-magnitude #earthquake hits near Mexico's Baja Peninsula.  
NFL: Controversial end zone call was wrong, but Seattle victory stands.  
The #BBC apologizes to Queen Elizabeth over Abu Hamza report.  
Obama to #UNGA: "Path to democracy does not end with the casting of a ballot"  
President Obama at U.N. says Ambassador Stevens came to love people of Middle East.  
Corps of Engineers not liable for #Katrina damage, court rules.  
Deadline for Libyan militias to disband passes without incident.  
What did you think of the ending of the #Packers-#Seahawks game?  
Suspect in slaying of U.S. couple on Caribbean isle due in court Tuesday.  
Person of interest charged in Florida missing student case.  
Iran blocks YouTube, Google over Mohammed video.  
Germany seeks to prosecute former Nazi camp guard living in U.S.  
Brandt Snedeker wins golf's Tour Championship, FedEx Cup and $11.44 million.  
Romney, Obama prep for three head-to-head matchups that will help decide the race.  
Week-old panda cub dies at Smithsonian's National Zoo.  
7 dead, 5 missing in Nepal avalanche.  
Seven dismembered and burned bodies were found in the Mexican state of Michoacan on Saturday, authorities said.  
Sunni Islam leader urges Muslims to respond to portrayals of Mohammed "through patience and wisdom."  
U.S. braces for more protests after demonstrations in Pakistan that killed at least 15, injured 100-plus.  
US #Senate votes after midnight to fund federal government for 6 months. Also voted to slam Iran.  
Secret Service scandal did not compromise security, Homeland Security probe finds  
Sources: Former SEALs died after coming to aid of others in Benghazi attack  
Libya pro-democracy protesters overtake Islamist group's HQ in Benghazi  
Mitt Romney paid 14.1 % tax rate on $13.7 million income in 2011, campaign says.  
Pittsburgh police: Man in high-rise standoff surrenders peacefully; hostage not harmed.  
Clinton to remove Iranian exile group from terror list, administration officials say.  
Three militants, Israeli soldier dead after border firefight.  
Gunman has at least one hostage in #Pittsburgh high-rise, police say.  
Police: Gunman holds hostages in #Pittsburgh high rise  
Several diplomatic facilities were shuttered as many brace for intensified protests over anti-Islam movie.  
Cancer center announces $3B effort aimed at significantly reducing cancer deaths by the end of this decade.  
U.S. official: #Afghanistan surge over as last of extra troops leave country.  
#Amish leader convicted of hate crimes in beard attacks.  
Soldier serving at recently attacked #Afghanistan base gives birth to baby boy.  
CNN's reveals the 2012 Top 10 of the Year.  (Video) #CNNHeroes 
Syrian gas station hit by airstrike, killing or wounding 110, group says.  
Source: U.S. Ambassador to Libya, in months before he was killed, said his name was on an al Qaeda hit list.  
2 girls in Iran beat up a cleric after he asked one of them to cover up more.  
Prosecutors seek more charges against #Colorado theater shooting suspect.  
Report: 'Worrisome' levels of arsenic in #rice.  
#NHL cancels some preseason games.  
Bagged #spinach recalled on listeria fears.  #foodsafety 
Fast and Furious report urges discipline but no charges for 14 ATF employees  
Fast and Furious report finds DOJ management failures.  
UNC coach Roy Williams has surgery to remove kidney tumor, school says.  
Italy upholds convictions of Americans in CIA kidnap case.  
9 killed in Pakistan bomb attack, authorities say.  
France shuts diplomatic missions in 20 countries after magazine publishes Mohammed cartoons.  
French satirical magazine published cartoons featuring a figure resembling Mohammed in issue on newsstands today.  
Teachers strike settled: Chicago students missed 7 days of class, but they're back today.  
Colombian president: Wanted drug lord Daniel "El Loco" Barrera captured.  #elloco 
#Chicago teachers' #strike ends after teachers union voted to return to work on Wednesday, according to delegates.  
Judge says #Arizona can enforce #immigration law.  
Blue Jays shortstop Yunel Escobar suspended for 3 games over eye black slur.  #YunelEscobar 
10 killed after blast rocks Mexican refinery near border.  #mexico 
Report says Turkey's Kurdish conflict becoming more violent.  
Gambia frees 2 Americans imprisoned for treason; agrees to halt executions.  
This year hottest on record, federal agency says.  
Magazine fined, ordered not to distribute revealing Kate Middleton photos.  
132 inmates escape from Mexican prison near U.S. border.  
Suicide bomb targeted van carrying foreigners, killing 9 people on main road near Kabul's international airport.  
Actor John Ingle, who played Edward Quartermaine on "General Hospital," dies.  #generalhospital 
Snowboarder Shaun White arrested in hotel fracas.  #shaunwhite 
Coast Guard searches after #cruise ship passenger goes overboard.  
Zoo officials waiting for first glimpse of new baby panda.  
Chicago school officials seek court order to end teacher strike.  
Floods in northern Cameroon kill dozens, displace thousands.  
Obama administration hits China with new trade complaint.  
#Chicago Mayor Rahm Emanuel asks city lawyers to file an injunction to immediately end the teachers #strike.  
Teachers #strike in Chicago's public schools will continue into the new week, #Chicago Teachers Union says.  
Bad weather delays Space Shuttle Endeavour's last trip.  #shuttleEndeavour 
More arrests in U.S. Consulate attack, Libyan official says.  #libya 
NATO admits it killed Afghan civilians in an airstrike early Sunday morning.  
Nicki Minaj, Keith Urban join 'American Idol' as judges.  
4 NATO troops killed by attackers dressed as Afghan police are Americans, Obama administration source says.  
Royal family going to court to stop publication of more topless photos, spokesman tells Britain's Press Association.  
Afghan insurgents who staged raid on military camp where Prince Harry is based wore U.S. uniforms, NATO said.  
Egypt's prime ministers says "a number" of embassy protesters say they were paid  
Insurgents in deadly attack in Afghanistan wore U.S. Army uniforms, ISAF says  
Yemen, Sudan try to keep U.S. from adding Marines to protect embassies  
California filmmaker linked to anti-Islam video meets with probation officer  
A typhoon packing fierce winds is barreling toward Okinawa, Japan.  
FBI investigators put off visit to Libya until conditions in the region are safer.  
Palace officials say magazine that published topless photos of the Duchess of Cambridge was motivated by greed.  
FBI expected to arrive in Libya today to investigate attack that killed U.S. ambassador and three other Americans.  
Anti-US rallies reach Australia. Sydney protesters march on consulate; signs read: "Obama, Obama, we like Osama."  
U.N. asks non-Libyan staff to leave Benghazi as "precautionary measure"  
Maker of anti-Islam film that sparked violent protests faces probation review  
2 U.S. Marines die in "sustained attack" on Afghan base, U.S. officials say  
Chicago teachers union officials will meet Sunday to vote on whether to end strike  
Tentative deal reached in Chicago teacher strike, source says  
White House details fiscal cliff spending cuts  
Classes to resume at N. Dakota State Univ. after bomb threat all-clear.  
State TV: 3 killed, 28 wounded in protests outside U.S. Embassy in #Tunisia.  
#Obama to speak as fallen diplomats' remains are returned to U.S.  
U of #Texas campus to reopen after bomb threat canceled.  
Witnesses: #Nigeria military, police fire shots to disperse protesters in Jos.  
All buildings at North Dakota State Univ. being evacuated after bomb threat.  
Univ. of #Texas police say buildings evacuated due to general bomb threat.  
All buildings on University of #Texas campus being evacuated due to threats.  
Protesters take down U.S. flag at embassy in Tunis; black flag raised.  
Official: U.S. Marine security team being sent to #Yemen.  
Report: Protesters try to climb gates of U.S. Embassy in Tunis, #Tunisia.  
At least 1 killed in clash at KFC restaurant in #Lebanon.  
Witness: German Embassy in #Sudan on fire after anti-Islam film protests.  
Witnesses: Police fire on protesters near U.S. Embassy in #Yemen.  
No school Friday in #Chicago, but end of teachers strike may be near.  
Another former SEAL identified as 4th Benghazi victim  
NYPD: Arrest made in daytime rape of 73-year-old woman in Central Park  
Former SEAL, online gaming maven among Benghazi dead  
CNN poll: 44% say they're worse off than 4 years ago, 37% say better off  
Clashes outside U.S. Embassy in #Yemen leave 4 protesters dead, Yemeni officials say.  
Libya media: Arrests made in attack on consulate that led to death of U.S. ambassador, 3 others  
224 reported injured in Cairo, Egypt, during protests over ant-Islamic movie.  
Staffer on Anti-Islamic movie says its maker identified himself as Abenob Nakoula Basseley.  
Hillary Clinton: Should be no debate that violence in response to speech is not acceptable.  
Hillary Clinton: Anti-Islam video that sparked protests "disgusting and reprehensible."  
Demonstrators in Sanaa, Yemen, attempt to storm the U.S. #Embassy there.  
After 2 years, Nicaragua to free American deemed innocent by rights groups  
Arrests, injuries outside U.S. Embassy in Cairo on second day of protests  
18 workers at JFK Airport charged in theft of 100,000 mini-bottles of alcohol  
"Innocence of Muslims" staff and crew say they were "grossly misled"  
U.S. drones expected to be used in hunt for consulate attackers, senior official says  
Diplomat killed Tuesday in Libya warned 2 years ago about jihadist sentiment  
U.N. Security Council says #Libya, Egypt attacks "unjustifiable."  
Think tank says #Libya attack may have been an act of revenge by al Qaeda.  
Ambassador died after being overcome by smoke at Embassy in #Libya, U.S sources say.  
Attack in #Libya planned, protest used as diversion, U.S. sources say.  
FBI to join investigation into deadly attack on U.S. Embassy in #Libya.  
Afghan leaders concerned about possible protests there in wake of deadly #Libya attack.  
President Obama: Attack will not break the bonds between U.S. and #Libya.  
Clinton: U.S. won't rest until killers of ambassador to #Libya Christopher Stevens face justice.  
Hillary Clinton: #Libya killings should "shock the conscience of people of all faiths."  
U.S. Marines on way to Benghazi in #Libya to provide extra security.  
President Obama condemns killing of U.S. ambassador to #Libya.  
3 security staff died in #Libya attack that killed U.S. ambassador Christopher Stephens, source says.  
U.S. ambassador to #Libya killed in rocket attack in Benghazi.  
U.S. ambassador to #Libya has been killed, witness says.  
#Moody's threatens to downgrade US credit rating unless deficit reduction deal reached. S&P downgraded US in 2011.  
350,000 students in #Chicago to miss 3rd day of school as teachers' #strike continues.  
Libya reports protest over film leads to death of employee at US Consulate; nationality of victim unknown.  
#Libya reports American killed during U.S. consulate protests in Benghazi, U.S. official says.  
Protesters climb walls of U.S. Embassy in Cairo, Egypt, take down American flags. U.S. personnel fire warning shots.  
Defense secretary suggests former SEAL could be penalized for bin Laden book.  
FAMU says it's not responsible for drum major's hazing death.  
Yemen defense minister survives apparent assassination attempt.  
Andy #Murray defeats Novak Djokovic in 5-set match to win the U.S. Open men's tennis championship.  #USOpen 
CNN Poll: #Obama up six points over #Romney.  #CNNelections 
Anonymous member claims to take down #GoDaddy.  
No massacre of Indians by gold miners in Venezuela, group now says.  
More than 30 killed in tribal violence in southeastern Kenya.  
Al Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula's second in command killed, Yemen says.  
Striking Chicago teachers resume negotiations with city's public school system.  
FBI arrests mayor of Trenton, New Jersey.  
Obama outraises Romney for the first time in months  
Union rep says Chicago teachers are set to go on strike Monday after contract talks with school board stall  
#Serena #Williams beats top-ranked Victoria Azarenka in 3 sets to capture U.S. Open women's singles title.  #USOpen 
Fugitive Iraq VP sentenced to death.  
Hustler magazine offers $1 million for reputed Romney tax returns  
Twisters hit NYC buroughs of Queens, Brooklyn  
Washington Nationals shut down ace pitcher Stephen Strasburg amid pennant race  
Pakistani Christian girl accused of burning the Quran is released on bail.  
4 dead in suicide attack in area near embassies in Kabul, Afghanistan. Taliban claims responsibility.  
2 kids rescued after allegedly being abducted by their dad and taken on a stolen boat. The dad is in custody.  
Florida A&M students will have to sign no-hazing pledge to take classes  
Rep. Jesse Jackson Jr. leaves Mayo Clinic after bipolar depression treatment  
After re-interviewing SEALs in bin Laden raid, Pentagon says new book inaccurate  
Leno took 50% pay cut -- $15M -- to reduce "Tonight Show" layoffs, NBC says  
Appeals panel overturns New Orleans Saints player suspensions  
Hurricane Leslie weakens to tropical storm, appears likely to miss Bermuda.  
Canada expels Iranian diplomats and suspends relations, citing concern over Iran's nuclear program.  
Hillary Clinton plans to designate Pakistan-based Haqqani network as terror organization, two officials tell CNN.  
Italian coast guard rescues 56 people after boat founders. Dozens are feared missing.  
Britain's Prince Harry deployed to Afghanistan, military says.  
14-year-old Christian girl accused of blasphemy in Pakistan has been granted bail.  
Obama: If you share that faith with me – if you share that hope with me – I ask you tonight for your vote.  #DNC 
Obama to #DNC: The 2008 election wasn’t about me. It was about you. My fellow citizens – you were the change.  
Obama to #DNC: Lower our deficit by spending trillions more on new tax breaks for the wealthy? – well, you do the math.  
Obama to #DNC: After two wars that cost us thousands of lives and over a trillion dollars, it’s time to do some nation-building right here. 
In #DNC speech, Obama makes pledge to veterans: When you take off the uniform, we will serve you as well as you’ve served us. 
Obama to #DNC: Help me recruit 100,000 math and science teachers in the next 10 years, and improve early childhood education. #CNNelections 
Obama to #DNC: climate change is not a hoax. More droughts and floods are not a joke. In this election, you can do something about it. 
Obama tells #DNC that Republicans "want your vote, but they don’t want you to know their plan." Full text:  
Barack Obama to #DNC: "Madam Chairwoman, delegates, I accept your nomination for president of the United States."  
Biden praises Obama in speech to #DNC: "I’ve seen him tested. I know his strength." Full text:  #CNNelections 
Biden to #DNC: Romney said as president, he’d take a jobs tour. With his support for outsourcing, it’s going to have to be a foreign trip. 
Biden to #DNC, praising Obama's action against bin Laden: "If you attack innocent Americans, we will follow you to the ends of the Earth." 
Preliminary tests show #oil found on #Louisiana shore came from #BP spill.  
Will Arnett, Amy Poehler separate after 9 years of marriage.  #amypoehler #willarnett 
Joe Biden to #DNC: We're on a mission to move this nation forward—from doubt and downturn, to promise and prosperity.  
Ask Osama bin Laden if he is better off than he was four years ago, tells #DNC in speech praising Obama's record. 
Despite what you heard in Tampa, an exceptional country does care about the rise of the oceans, tells #DNC  
Former Rep. Gabby Giffords takes #DNC stage to lead Pledge of Allegiance: Watch live  
.@BeauBiden, nominating his father, for VP, recalls Iraq visit. Watch live:  
President Obama lists second-term goals, including a million new manufacturing jobs. Excerpts:  #DNC #CNNelections 
.@RepJohnLewis reminds Charlotte -- and US -- of Jim Crow past. #DNC: Watch live:  #CNNelections 
Rep. Barney Frank, speaking now, says during Romney term as governor, MA was 47th in job growth. Full #DNC sked:  
Singer James Taylor on stage now at #DNC: Watch live:  #CNNelections 
An Illinois jury finds former Chicago-area police sergeant Drew #Peterson guilty of murder in 2004 death of ex-wife.  
U.S. Airways Philadelphia security scare an apparent hoax, police say.  
Hurricane Leslie could be "historic" storm for Bermuda, emergency agency says.  
Man held in Philadelphia after U.S. Airways explosives scare.  
Former Baltimore Ravens and Cleveland Browns owner Art #Modell has died, son says.  
4 people died in a school bus collision with a tractor-trailer in southern Nebraska.  
Clinton: How did we get four surplus budgets in a row? A one-word answer: arithmetic.  #DNC 
Clinton on Obamacare: Are we better off because President Obama fought for health care reform? You bet we are. #DNC #CNNelections 
Clinton: Republicans want to go back to the same old policies that got us into trouble in the first place:  #DNC 
Clinton: Democracy does not have to be a blood sport, it can be an honorable enterprise that advances the public interest. #DNC 
Bill Clinton: And I want a man who has the good sense to marry Michelle Obama. #DNC #CNNelections 
Bill Clinton: I want a man who is cool on the outside but who burns for America on the inside. #DNC #CNNelections 
For many years, our middle class has been chipped, squeezed and hammered, tells #DNC. Their fight is my fight. #CNNelections 
Too many women are shut out and silenced, tells #DNC. "I'm here because I spoke out."  #CNNelections 
UAW President Bob King praises Obama, saying he did not what was popular, but what was right. #CNNelections #DNC #autobailout 
President Obama will make his first appearance at the #DNC tonight to hear President Clinton’s speech, two people tell CNN. 
Meet Sister Simone Campbell, the nun on the bus (speaking now):  #CNNelections 
Ex-Rep. Gabrielle Giffords is in Charlotte to attend #DNC, spokeswoman Hayley Zachary says.  #CNNelections 
President Obama has focused on jobs from Day 1, tells #DNC. Schedule of speakers:  #CNNelections 
Rep. Cleaver of MO preaches a celebration of hope at #DNC: "our hope instructs us to march on!" 
Repeat the past? Mitt Romney would be worse, says Full #DNC sked:  
Want a you're-on-your-own, winner-take-all society? Then vote Republican, Bill Clinton plans to tell #DNC. Excerpts:  
Justice Department OKs New Hampshire voter ID law.  
#Leslie strengthens into #hurricane with maximum sustained winds of 75 mph.  
Tsunami warning for Costa Rica, Nicaragua, Panama canceled after 7.6 quake.  
Tsunami warnings in effect for Pacific coastlines of Costa Rica, Panama and Nicaragua.  
Warnings over #Hantavirus sent to Yosemite visitors from 39 other countries.  
USGS: Magnitude of quake off Costa Rica reduced from 7.9 to 7.6.  
7.9-magnitude #earthquake hits off coast of Costa Rica.  
Tens of thousands of dead fish wash up Lake Erie shore.  
Hundreds of Afghan troops fired following attacks on #NATO force members.  
Canadian shooter targeted new Quebec premier Pauline #Marois, police confirm.  
Report: Suspect shouted, "The English are waking up!" after deadly shooting at Canadian political event.  
1 dead, 1 critically wounded in shooting at victory speech by new premier of Quebec, Pauline Marois.  
Tales to inspire, from raise beams of steel to the sky, send a man to the moon, connect the world with touch of a button. 
Barack believes "women are more than capable of making our own choices about our bodies and our health care," tells #DNC. 
Gifts Michelle said she and Barack got from family: unconditional love, sacrifice, chance to go places they hadn't imagined. #DNC 
I've seen best of US in wounded warriors who tell me they’re not just going to walk again, they’re going to run, tells #DNC. 
Meet Elaine Brye, the military mom from Ohio who is introducing  #DNC #CNNelections 
Former New York Mayor Ed #Koch hospitalized.  
Just before starting his #DNC keynote, tweets pic with his twin brother:  
Lilly Ledbetter praises Obama's leadership: Women who face pay discrimination can now get their day in court  #DNC 
A change we believed in, a change we fought for, a change President Obama delivered: #DNC riff by ex Obama chief of staff. 
Men and women are going back to work with pride of building something stamped Made in America, ex-gov of OH, tells #DNC. 
Obama pressed for fairness in military, ending #DADT, allowing women in more jobs, tells #DNC.  
Nancy Keenan, president, tells #DNC: "We cannot trust Mitt Romney to respect our rights." Schedule of speakers:  
#FAMU suspends dance team after new #hazing allegation.  
Renewable energy from solar and wind has more than doubled under Obama, Sec. of Salazar tells #DNC.  
Addressing #DNC now: Secretary of Ken Salazar: live on  #CNNelections 
Listing “tough and right calls,” at #DNC praises Obama for auto bailout, bin Laden, bank regulation:  
They’re pushing budget-busting tax cuts and economy-busting spending cuts, tells #DNC  
Under Obama, states get welfare flexibility only if they move 20% more people to work, tells #DNC sked:  
"Queen of Cocaine" killed in #Colombia, police say.  
CNN Poll: Romney gets convention bounce of 1 point.  #CNNelections 
Peace talks between FARC and government of Colombia set for October  
South Korea looks to expand chemical castration law, state-run media report.  
Phone-hacking victims could number more than 1,000, UK police say.  
Suicide attack kills 25 in eastern Afghanistan.  
Bahrain court upholds verdicts against group accused of coup attempt.  
Suspected U.S. #drone strike kills civilians in Yemen, officials say.  
Suspected U.S. #drone strike kills civilians in Yemen, officials say.  
'Green Mile' actor Michael Clarke Duncan dead at age 54, family rep says.  #MichaelClarkeDuncan #GreenMile 
6.4 magnitude #earthquake south of the Indonesian island of #Java.  
Miners, officers clash at South African mine.  
Dozens of police injured in Northern Ireland clashes.  
Explosives-filled car slams into a U.S. Consulate vehicle in Pakistan; conflicting reports have emerged whether any Americans were killed 
2 Americans killed in suicide attack in Peshawar, Pakistan  
The Rev. Sun Myung #Moon, founder of the church known as the #Moonies, died Monday in South Korea, according to the Washington Times. 
Mandatory evacuation lifted around strained Louisiana canal.  
South Africa to drop murder charges against miners.  
1,600 people were killed in Syria last week, making it deadliest week in civil war, UNICEF says.  
U.S. temporarily halts training of Afghan police after rise in attacks by Afghan forces on NATO troops.  
Louisiana authorities try to ease pressure on canal lock to keep it from failing.  
ICE chief of staff resigns amid allegations that she helped create a culture of sexual discrimination against men.  
Oscar- and Grammy-winning songwriter Hal David has died. He was 91.  
A car bomb exploded outside a Baghdad coffee shop Saturday, killing two people and wounding 11, police said.  
Lower Mississippi River reopened as remnants of #Isaac head north.  
College football fan dies after 35-foot fall at Georgia Dome.  
Maker of drug thalidomide, which caused birth defects in 1950s-60s, has apologized after 50 years.  
Death toll up to 12, plus 57 wounded, in attack by 2 suicide bombers on joint U.S.-Afghan base.  
2 suicide bombers struck a joint U.S.-Afghan military base, killing 6 civilians, authorities said.  
Mitt #Romney tours #Isaac's damage in Louisiana; President #Obama to follow on Monday.  
Wyoming's gray wolf population to be removed from endangered list  
600,000 Mr. Coffee single cup brewers in voluntary recall due to burn risk  
Millions of dollars worth of maple syrup stolen from warehouse.  
Man dies in landslide after earthquake near #Philippines. Tsunami warnings canceled.  
Gunman at N.J. supermarket kills 2, then himself, official says. He was carrying AK-47 and handgun.  
7.9 earthquake hits off coast of #Philippines, triggers tsunami warning.  
Fact Check: Optimistic about kids' future?  . . . and military budget cuts  #CNNElections 
Two bodies found in flooded Louisiana home.  #Isaac 
The America we all know is the many becoming one….uniting to save the world from unspeakable darkness, tells #RNC. #CNNelections 
Romney lists his five keys to 12 million new jobs: energy, school choice, trade, balanced budget, #smbiz:  #CNNelections 
This Obama economy has crushed the middle class, says in #RNC acceptance speech.  #CNNelections 
Government should be a system dedicated to building tomorrow’s prosperity, not redistributing today’s, tells #RNC. #CNNelections 
Romney asks: If you felt that excitement when you voted for Barack Obama, shouldn’t you feel that excitement now when he’s President Obama? 
I wish President Obama had succeeded because I want America to succeed, tells #RNC #CNNelections 
I acccept your nomination for president of the United States, says to #RNC applause.  
His moment RT Watch Mitt Romney's presidential nomination acceptance speech LIVE:  #CNNElections 
Our problem with President Obama is not that he's a bad person, it's that he's a bad president, tells #RNC. #CNNelections 
His immigrant grandfather told that there is no limit to what he can do in America, the senator tells #RNC  
Clint Eastwood puts on #RNC show, asking questions of Obama, represented by empty chair. #CNNelections 
Sage #Stallone died of heart attack, not drugs, coroner concludes.  
Meet Tom Stemberg, Staples founder (speaking now): Why I'm supporting Romney  via 
#Tennis pro Andy Roddick to retire after U.S. Open.  #andyroddick 
Up to 1 million mangoes recalled in #salmonella outbreak.  
Praising Romney, calls him a champion for bringing hope to education. #RNC #CNNelections 
To #RNC, says: Mr. President, it is time to stop blaming your predecessor for your failed economic policies:  
Speaking to #RNC, links Obama to Jimmy Carter, saying each president produced little effective legislation. 
Now is the time to restore promise of America, Romney says in speech excerpts listing his 5 steps to 12 million jobs:  
Theater shooting suspect James #Holmes called a university switchboard 9 minutes before he allegedly opened fire.  
Former University of Virginia #lacrosse player convicted of killing ex-girlfriend sentenced to 23 years in prison.  
Pentagon is expected to inform former Navy SEAL that he has violated secrecy agreements with bin Laden book.  
#Isaac has been downgraded from a tropical storm to a tropical depression, the National Hurricane Center said.  
270 South Africa miners charged in deaths of 34 fellow miners.  
Conflicting reports now of dam failure in Miss., but evacuations reported under way.  #Isaac 
Mississippi levee failing; evacuation of 50,000 to 60,000 people ordered.  #Isaac 
#Hurricane Kirk forms in Atlantic; no threat to land.  
Mississippi governor: Thousands of homes damaged by #Isaac.  
Mississippi dam expected to fail under #Isaac floodwaters.  
Tornado watch until 4 p.m. CT for parts of La., Ala., Miss., Fla.  #Isaac 
Tow truck driver killed clearing #Isaac debris in Miss.  
Tornado touches down in Pascagoula, Miss., weather service reports.  #Isaac 
Flooding reported in #Slidell, La., as pumping stations can't keep up.  
Almost 1 million customers without power from #Isaac.  
Thousands trapped by high water from storm surged caused by #Isaac.  
Power companies say more than 817,000 customers are without power in LA, MS, AL, FL, TX and AR.  #Isaac 
Most applause for is for this: "We have suffered no shortage of words in the WH. What’s missing is leadership in the WH." 
When his grandmother had Alzheimer's, tells #RNC, Medicare was there. "Medicare is a promise, and we will honor it." 
The Obama stimulus, tells #RNC, "was a case of political patronage, corporate welfare, and cronyism at their worst." 
As Syria butchers its people, everyone asks, 'where does America stand?' tells #RNC.  
Thousands being rescued as waters rise from #Isaac.  
I care less about where Mitt Romney takes his family to church, tells #RNC, than about where he will take this country. 
'President Obama is not as bad as people say,' tells #RNC; 'he's actually worse.' 
Sadly for the lonely voices of dissent in Syria and Iran ... our president is not being true to our values, tells #RNC 
Live: tells #RNC America is an exceptional nation and "always we have led from the front, never from behind." 
Mr. President, we will not let you bankrupt this great nation, Sen. Rand Paul tells #RNC. Live video  
8 children, 1 adult seriously injured as car jumps curb near Los Angeles school.  
Judge in #Trayvon Martin case to step down.  
NHC: 17 inches of rain has fallen during Tropical Storm #Isaac at Audubon Park in New Orleans, Louisiana.  
Local officials estimate up to 800 homes in Plaquemines Parish, LA have significant water damage.  #Isaac 
34 people rescued by boat in Hancock County, Miss. and 15 picked up by National Guard troops in trucks.  #Isaac 
New Orleans officially under a dusk to dawn curfew, NOPD says.  #Isaac 
#Isaac has been downgraded from a hurricane to a tropical storm, according to the National Hurricane Center.  
75 rescued from flooded homes and rooftops in Plaquemines Parish, CNN affiliate WWL reports. #Isaac  
150+ residents call to be rescued from rising floodwaters in Plaquemines Parish. #Isaac  
#Isaac weakens slightly to 75 mph, weather service says.  
#Isaac knocks out power to more than 500,000 customers in 4 states, utility companies say.  
#Isaac leads to 5-cent gas price spike.  
3 people rescued from #Isaac flooding in Plaquemines Parish, La., including 1 woman on roof, parish president says.  
#Isaac leaves 438,000+ customers without electricity in Arkansas, Louisiana and Mississippi, power company says.  
Reports of 10-12 ft. of water in some homes, #Plaquemines Parish president says.  
National Weather Service: Heavy rainfall from #Isaac likely to result in flash floods across metro New Orleans.  
#Isaac is stationary off the coast of Louisiana, bringing dangerous storm surge to Gulf Coast.  
Death sentence upheld for gunman in 2008 terrorist attacks in #Mumbai.  
NHC: Tropical Storm #Kirk forms in the middle Atlantic becoming the 11th named storm of the season.  
Our ideas are right for America and their ideas have failed America, says in #RNC keynote. #CNNelections 
NHC: Hurricane #Isaac may get even stronger as it moves inland.  
America's dream of freedom has become a nightmare of dependence, says at #RNC: live coverage:  
Hurricane #Isaac makes landfall in southeastern Louisiana, the hurricane center says.  
#RNC nominates Paul Ryan by acclamation for VP. Live blog:  
Hurricane Isaac's eye is 30 miles from the Mississippi River's mouth and 105 miles from New Orleans.  #Isaac 
NJ delegates put Romney over the top as #RNC officially nominates him for president. Live blog:  
#Iraq announces 21 people executed in one day.  
Hurricane #Isaac strengthens to sustained winds of 80 mph, NHC says.  
Airports in New Orleans; Mobile, Ala.; & Gulfport-Biloxi, Miss. have ceased commercial flights over #Isaac.  
Coast Guard searching off coast of Pensacola for man on personal watercraft, as #Isaac nears.  
Obama signs emergency declaration for Mississippi as #Isaac approaches.  
French open inquiry into whether former Palestinian leader Yasser Arafat was murdered, official says.  
Renowned classical pianist Van Cliburn, has advanced bone cancer.  
Rules are finalized that double fuel economy standard to 54.5 mpg for cars, light trucks by 2024.  
Romney arrives at GOP convention. #RNC2012  
#Isaac now Category 1 hurricane, with maximum sustained winds of 75 mph.  
#Isaac expected to be hurricane when center reaches southeastern Louisiana "as early as this evening," forecasters say.  
Obama to Gulf Coast residents in path of #Isaac: "Now's not the time to tempt fate."  
Man trying to create Bigfoot hoax on highway is hit by 2 cars and dies, Montana officials say.  
Mars rover #Curiosity transmits a human voice, also sends back awesome new photos.  
2003 death of American peace activist in Israel ruled an accident.  
12 Mexican federal police officers have been detained, accused of shooting at a U.S. diplomatic vehicle.  
Airports closing in NOLA, Baton Rouge, Biloxi due to #Isaac.  
NHC: Winds in #Isaac have increased to 70 mph, just 4 mph short of hurricane
strength.  
NTSB: High speed, worn parts led to deadly Reno Air Races crash.  #aviation 
Louisiana Gov. Bobby Jindal says he won't attend GOP convention in Tampa so he can deal with #Isaac.  
Mississippi activates 1,500 National Guard troops to support emergency operations as #Isaac nears.  
Mississippi governor says storm surge plus high tide could raise water levels up to 16 feet when #Isaac hits.  
Tropical Storm Isaac follows Katrina's path as it moves into the Gulf  
Big earthquake hits off coast of El Salvador  
#Quake 'swarm' shakes Southern California.  
Gov. Bobby Jindal declares state of emergency for Tropical Storm #Isaac in #Louisiana.  
Correction: Police fired 16 rounds at Empire State shooter, who killed his former co-worker with 5 shots to the head.  
Police fired 16 rounds at Empire State Building shooter, who died from 5 bullets to head, medical examiner says.  
Snooki spin-off: 6-pound 'Guido.'  
New video shows Syrian vice president at meeting in Damascus. Earlier reports indicated he had defected.  
At least 330 people reported killed in Syria today, according to opposition Local Coordination Committees of Syria.  
Republican National Convention to convene Monday and immediately recess until Tuesday due to severe weather.  
Neil Armstrong, the first man to walk on the moon, has died, his family said Saturday. He was 82. 
Tropical Storm Isaac knocks out power to most of Haiti, causes at least one death.  
Tropical Storm Isaac knocks out power to most of Haiti, causes at least one death.  
Police gunfire responsible for wounding of all 9 people outside Empire State Building, NYPD commissioner says.  
19 dead, 53 wounded in Venezuela refinery explosion.  
Explosion at major oil refinery in Venezuela kills at least 7, injures 48.  
Senior Pakistani Taliban leader killed in #NATO airstrike in Afghanistan's Kunar province, coalition says.  
Tropical Storm #Isaac is lashing #Haiti as it nears landfall.  
Samsung to challenge ruling that recommends $1B in damages to Apple over patent dispute.
 
Jury recommends #Apple be awarded more than $1B in damages; finds #Samsung guilty of violating several Apple patents.  
Notes left by director Tony Scott didn’t give motive for why he jumped off bridge, L.A. coroner's office says.  
Country singer Randy Travis cited in simple assault case after disturbance with man outside Plano, Texas, church  
UPDATE: There are now conflicting reports about nationality of those hurt in attack on U.S. diplomatic car in Mexico  
3 U.S. #Marines wounded in shooting in #Mexico.  
Lance Armstrong banned from competition for life by U.S. doping agency.  
Gunman in New York shootings laid off from his job a year ago, authorities say.  
Gunman and 1 of 9 others shot at Empire State Building dead, officials say.  
10 people now reported shot, gunman killed in New York shootings.  
Suspected gunman in Empire State Building shootings shot and killed by police, NYPD says. 
Several shot near Empire State Building, authorities say.  
Anders Breivik, who killed 77 in bomb and gun attack in #Norway, is declared sane and sentenced to 21 years.  
Lance #Armstrong calls it quits in his battle to end an investigation by U.S. Anti-Doping Agency.  
LL Cool J broke burglary suspect's nose, jaw, ribs.  
Autopsy finds Rodney King died from accidental drowning.  
Two athletes, trainer out of London Paralympics over sex assault charges.  
John Lennon killer denied parole for 7th time.  
#Gambia has had no executions in 30 years, says it will put to death everyone on death row by mid-September.  
Aimee Copeland, the student who caught a flesh-eating bacteria that forced multiple amputations, has gone home.  
Agencies warn of possible anarchist activity at conventions.  #politics 
#Oakland pitcher Colon suspended 50 games after testosterone test.  
40% of U.S. food is wasted, report says.  
West Nile outbreak largest ever in U.S., CDC says.  
CDC to announce increase in West Nile virus infections, deaths in the U.S.  
Paralyzed man dies after losing assisted-suicide case.  
A 1960 interview with Martin Luther King Jr. has been found in a Tennessee attic.  #MLK 
Record radiation found in fish near damaged #Fukushima nuclear plant.  
Two Maryland teens killed when train derails and buries them under tons of coal.  
Tropical Storm #Isaac forms in Atlantic.  
Tennis ref in NYC for U.S. Open arrested in April killing of husband in California.  
Day care workers accused of orchestrating toddler fight.  
Rep. Todd #Akin pledges to stay in the Missouri Senate race.  
Report: Canada police have identified dismembered woman.  
Atlantic storm predicted to become hurricane as it heads into Caribbean.  
Federal court throws out new rules supporting air pollution standards.  
#Ebola outbreak kills 10 in the Democratic Republic of Congo, officials say.  
#Romania president keeps his job, court rules.  
Diana #Nyad ends latest attempt to swim across the Straits of Florida.  
Intense squall hinders Diana Nyad in swim from Cuba to Florida.  
Ethiopian Prime Minister Meles Zenawi has died, state television reported Tuesday.  
8 people killed, 66 wounded in bombing in #Turkey.  
Low water level shuts 11-mile stretch of Mississippi River, stranding 97 vessels  
In first such action, JetBlue fined $90K for violating passenger rights  
Rosie O'Donnell 'happy to be alive' after heart attack  
Comedian Phyllis Diller has died, manager says  
Judge throws out Lance Armstrong's lawsuit aimed at halting doping probe  
Rep. Akin apologizes for rape comment.  
20 killed in Venezuelan prison violence.  
Condoleezza Rice and Darla Moore first female members of Augusta National Golf Club.  
Augusta National Golf Club admits first women members.  
Army approves research for anti-depressant nasal-spray.  
Filmmaker Tony Scott, director of "Top Gun," dies after he jumps from a California bridge. He was 68  
#Gu Kailai, wife of disgraced China official, gets commuted death sentence in UK businessman's murder, source says  
Diana Nyad progressing in historic swim attempt. "No stopping her now," crew members write on blog.  
#Assange links #WikiLeaks to freedom of expression around the world.  
Julian #Assange breaks silence, says U.S. "must renounce its witch hunt against #WikiLeaks."  
Layoffs hit "Tonight Show"; Leno's pay is cut to save jobs, source says  
United Airlines flight returns safely to Newark after engine trouble  
Engine struck by tire debris now operating normally, FAA says  
Blown tire debris sucked into airliner engine; it's returning to Newark airport  
GM recalls 250,000 SUVs for fire hazard  
Streaming video game site OnLive collapses and restructures.  
Prince William pilots helicopter that rescues 16-year-old girl from rip current.  
Philippines interior minister missing after small plane crashes, state-run news agency reports.  
North Korean leader tells his troops to be ready for "sacred war" during U.S.-South Korea exercises.  
Conflicting reports emerge about whether Syria's vice president has defected.  
Bomb kills four, injures 11 others at a market in southwestern Afghanistan, authorities say.  
Suicide bomber kills five soldiers near Quetta, #Pakistan, authorities say.  
Coalition service member has died after an insurgent attack in southern #Afghanistan, ISAF says.  
#Amazon says Hunger Games books have passed Harry Potter as its top-selling series.  
Justice Dept. civil rights investigators join Michigan shooting probe  
Dow, S&P finish higher for 6th straight week after posting modest gains Friday  
7 arrested in shooting of Louisiana police officer on Thursday  
South African President Zuma to open inquiry into killing of 34 miners.  
Coalition steps up fight against #Afghanistan "green-on-blue" attacks.  
Algerian Lakhdar Brahimi appointed to replace Kofi Annan as U.N. rep for Syria.  
Severed head, foot found along #Ontario river.  
Members of Pussy Riot punk rock band sentenced to 2 years in Russian prison.  
Report: Members of Russian punk rock band Pussy Riot found guilty of hooliganism.  
Death toll in crackdown on striking workers at South African mine is at more than 30, police say.  
Afghan police officer shoots at U.S. forces, killing 2 of them, before being shot and killed, U.S. military says. 
Horse flees up Broadway after NY carriage crashes.  #thosevagabondshoes 
Verdict in Gu Kailai murder trial in China to be announced Monday, a family friend tells CNN  
Conservative group president points finger at Southern Poverty Law Center in shooting  
Wisconsin changed on CNN electoral map from "lean Obama" to "tossup" after Ryan pick  
UK court rules against paralyzed man in "right to die" case.  
Suspect in conservative council shooting to face weapons, assault charges, source says.  
U.N. ending observer mission in Syria, French envoy says.  
2 police killed, 2 wounded in Louisiana "ambush," police spokesman says.  
Ecuador has granted WikiLeaks founder Julian #Assange asylum, Ecuador official says.  
7 Americans among 11 killed in #Afghanistan helicopter crash.  
11 killed as #NATO helicopter crashes in #Afghanistan.  
#Aeroflot flight from NYC to Moscow diverted to Iceland after U.S. officials received bomb threat.  
Ex-special forces officers accuse Obama of taking too much credit in killing of bin Laden.  
Winning ticket for $337M #Powerball drawing sold in Michigan.  
Six gunmen killed in attack on Pakistani air force base.  
Ecuador: Decision on asylum request by WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange coming Thursday  
Seattle's Felix Hernandez throws MLB's 3rd perfect game this season in 1-0 win over Tampa Bay  
Military appeals court halts trial of accused Fort Hood shooter over his beard  
Air Force: X-51A scramjet craft, designed to fly mach 4-6, crashes in Pacific  
Shooting wounds guard at Family Research Council.  
Injury forces Rafael Nadal out of U.S. Tennis Open.  
70 large fires burning across 14 states west of the Mississippi, officials say.  
#Dallas mayor declares emergency as West Nile virus spreads.  
Prince Philip taken to hospital, Buckingham Palace says.  
Damascus blast happened in Syrian military compound, journalist there tells CNN  
Syrian TV: Bomb explodes behind Damascus hotel housing U.N. monitors  
Woman whose boyfriend was charged with kidnapping her says she wasn't held against her will.  
Evangelist Billy #Graham, 93, was released from a hospital after a two-day stay for bronchitis.  
Saudi Arabia objects to some proposed Internet domain names, including .gay and .islam.  #ICANN 
Ohio man arrested Aug. 4 at Batman movie with gun, ammo, knives indicted on weapons charges.  
Obama, Romney court voters in battleground states, hitting on Medicare, energy.  #Election2012 
Mother of gunman in deadly Texas shootout says he had mental health issues.  
VP Joe #Biden: #Romney's unchained Wall Street will "put y'all back in chains."  
Ron Palillo, TV's 'Horshack,' dead at 63.  
Report: Computers stolen from Steve Jobs' home.  
Soccer stars #Ribery, #Benzema to face charges in prostitution case, Paris prosecutors say.  
4 killed as renegade troops attack #Yemen Defense Ministry.  
Mutant #butterflies found near Japan's tsunami-damaged nuclear plant.  
60-plus homes destroyed in Wash. blaze; 62 #wildfires burn in U.S., Forest Service says.  
China's most-wanted robber shot and killed by police.  
Suspect killed in shootings near Texas A&M identified as Thomas Caffall, 35.  
Fixes link: Burmese python found in Florida was 17 feet long, 164 pounds; had 87 eggs.  
$100M detection system failed to notice man on #JFK airport runway.  #aviation 
U.S. Rep. Jesse Jackson Jr. is being treated for bipolar depression, clinic says.  #mentalhealth 
3 dead in shooting near Texas A&M campus.  #TexasA&M 
Helen Gurley Brown, former editor-in-chief of #Cosmopolitan magazine dies at the age of 90, the Hearst Corporation said. 
Several people, including law enforcement officers, were shot during incident near Texas A&M, police say  
Gunman in custody after shooting reported near Texas A&M  
Syrian rebels say they have shot down a military jet  
Jennifer #Aniston engaged to actor Justin #Theroux.  
Rory #McIlroy wins PGA Championship by record eight shots.  
International Olympic Committee President Jacques Rogge declared the London #Olympics over Sunday night.  
Evangelist Billy Graham, 93, is hospitalized.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Team USA wins gold in men's basketball.  
Egypt's president removes 2 top military officers, rescinds decree that kept lawmaking power in generals' hands.  
Toll rises to 250 dead, 2,000 injured after two strong earthquakes in Iran  
Toll rises to 250 dead, 2,000 injured after two strong earthquakes in Iran  
Police fatally shoot knife-wielding man near Times Square  
Athlete dies during Ironman championship, organizers say  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: USA win women's basketball gold medal  
Mitt Romney and Paul Ryan address supporters in Manassas, Virginia. Watch Live  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Anchored by Usain Bolt, Jamaica wins 4x100 relay gold in world record time  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: U.S. women win 4x400-meter relay gold  
Death toll rises in Iran earthquakes near #Tabriz: At least 87 dead, 400 injured.  
Mitt Romney made his decision to pick Ryan on August 1, campaign aide says.  
Mitt Romney officially announces his running mate, Rep. Paul Ryan of Wisconsin.  
Three GOP sources tell CNN #Romney will pick Paul #Ryan as his VP. Watch the announcement on #CNN and #CNN.com  
1 dead after single-engine plane crashes in L.A. neighborhood  
Feds: Mississippi county runs 'school-to-prison pipeline'  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: U.S. women set world record in winning 4x100m relay gold  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: USA's Jordan Burroughs wins 74kg freestyle wrestling gold  
Army private gets 2 life sentences for plan to attack soldiers, their families  
Report: China's Gu Kailai admits murdering British businessman.  
Attorney General Eric Holder: Deadly Sikh temple shooting an "act of terrorism."  
U.S. extends sanctions on Hezbollah for support of Syrian government.  
U.S. foreign service officer, three senior U.S. military leaders killed by bomb in Afghanistan, officials say  
Florida prosecutors mistakenly release confidential #Zimmerman case documents.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Ashton Eaton of the United States wins the Olympic decathlon.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: U.S. women's soccer team win the gold, avenging its 2011 World Cup final loss to Japan.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Jamaican sprinter Usain Bolt becomes first man to win the 100 & 200 meters in consecutive Games.  
CNN Poll: Obama leads Romney by 7 points. #politics  
#OLYMPICS MEDAL MATCH: U.S. women's soccer team is now leading Japan 2-0. Follow the action as it happens.  
New York man pleads guilty to murder of 8-year-old Leiby #Kletzky.  
Olympic Result: USA's Claressa Shields wins women's middleweight boxing gold.  
#NOAA revises forecast, says more storms likely this hurricane season. 
#Nepal bans women under 30 from working in Gulf states.  
#Egypt sending more troops to North Sinai.  
Murder trial of #Gu Kailai adjourns without announcement of verdict, court official says  
Pediatrician, wife accused of #waterboarding young daughter  
Murder trial of #Gu Kailai begins in #China.  
Rescue plane arrives in #Antarctica to evacuate patient.  
Federal report: Bag with #bomb was at Detroit building guard desk for weeks.  
Top #Komen foundation leaders announce plans to leave posts.  
Libya's transitional council hands over power. #Libya  
Country singer Randy #Travis arrested, accused of DWI after being found naked and lying in road, authorities say.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Brittney Reese of the United States won the gold in the women's long jump.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: Misty May-Treanor and Kerri Walsh Jennings earn USA women's beach volleyball gold.  
#OLYMPICS RESULT: U.S. sprinters win the gold and silver medals in the men's 110-meter hurdles. 
#OLYMPIC RESULTS: Allyson Felix of the United States won the gold medal in the women's 200 meters.  
July hottest month on record for contiguous U.S., NOAA says.  
Rescue under way in darkness at U.S. Antarctic research station.  
#Ernesto weakens to tropical storm as it douses Mexico's Yucatan Peninsula with rain, forecasters say  
Hurricane #Ernesto is forecast to weaken over Mexico's Yucatan Peninsula hours after making landfall.  
Convicted murderer with IQ of 61 executed in #Texas.  
#Tennessee mosque set to open Friday.  
Jared #Loughner, accused of shooting 19, including Gabrielle Giffords, pleads guilty to 19 charges in plea deal.  
Jared #Loughner, gunman accused of killing 6, wounding Gabrielle Giffords, is found competent to stand trial.  
#Ernesto intensifies to hurricane off coast of Mexico, National Hurricane Center says.  
Olympic result: U.S. gymnast Aly Raisman takes gold in women's floor exercise.  
Flooding bringing chaos to Philippine capital.  
Fans mourn death of prolific composer Marvin Hamlisch.  
19 reported killed in attack on Nigerian church.  
U.N. pulls monitors out of Syria's biggest city because of security concerns.  
Former Edwards' aide will not face contempt charges.  
#Detroit police search for suspect in riverfront shooting that injured 7 people.  
#OLYMPIC RESULT: USA's Jennifer Suhr wins women's pole vault gold.  
Tropical Storm #Ernesto expected to become a hurricane late Monday.  
Suspect in temple shooting discharged from Army in 1998 for "patterns of misconduct," source says.  
Alleged shooter in Wisconsin temple attack was Wade Michael Page, age 40, law enforcement sources say.  
Syrian Prime Minister Riyad Hijab has defected to Jordan, opposition says.  
Sikh temple gunman was an Army vet and perhaps a white supremacist, source says  
Gunman in attack on Wisconsin Sikh temple was an Army veteran who may have been a white supremacist, said a law enforcement source 
Suspected gunman in mass shooting at Sikh temple in Wisconsin was white male, about 40, according to ATF  
Authorities are treating the shooting at a Sikh temple as a "domestic terrorist-type incident," police chief says.  
Usain Bolt of Jamaica defended his 100 meters title for a gold medal, setting an Olympic record with a time of 9.63.  
13 Egyptian soldiers killed in attack on army checkpoint.  
Seven people killed, including gunman, in shooting at Sikh temple, police say.  
A police officer "put down" a gunman at a Sikh temple in suburban Milwaukee, a police spokesman says.  
Gunman still on loose after multiple shootings at Sikh temple near Milwaukee, CNN affiliate WTMJ reporting.  
#Olympics result: Andy Murray of Great Britain wins gold medal in men’s tennis, defeating Roger Federer of Switzerland.  
Garrett Reid, son of Philadelphia Eagles head coach Andy Reid, found dead at Eagles training camp, team says.  
Iran test-fires missile with 185-mile range, state news agency reports  
#Olympics Result: U.S. men win 4x100 medley relay - 18th career gold for Phelps  
#Olympics Result: U.S. women's 4x100 medley swim team wins gold in world record time  
#Olympics Result: Mike and Bob Bryan of U.S. win gold medal in doubles tennis, defeating French team.  
#Olympics Result: Serena Williams of U.S. wins gold medal in women’s singles tennis, defeating Russian Maria Sharapova.  
#Olympics Result: Jamie Lynn Gray of U.S. wins gold, sets Olympic record in women's 50m rifle three positions.
 
2 planes come too close to one another at Detroit airport, FAA official says. #aviation  
Syrian forces, rebels fight to control Aleppo broadcast center  
#Olympics Result: USA's Katie Ledecky wins 800m freestyle gold -- at age 15  
#Olympics Result: In his last individual event, 100m butterfly, Michael #Phelps wins gold  
#Olympics Result: USA's Missy Franklin wins 200m backstroke gold, sets world record  
British court convicts parents in "honor" murder.  
Syrian opposition reports massacre of 62 in Hama. #Syria  
Boxer Floyd #Mayweather released from a Las Vegas jail.  
Lawmakers close loophole in Congress stock trading law after CNN report  
No drought aid for farmers, ranchers as Congress breaks for summer  
Authorities give all clear at O'Hare after security checkpoint shutdown  
Tropical Storm #Ernesto forms, moves toward Caribbean  
"Suspicious activity" closes security checkpoints at O'Hare Terminal 2  
#Olympics Result: Phelps takes gold, Lochte silver in 200m individual medley  
Judge restores Katherine Jackson as guardian of Michael Jackson's children  
#Olympics Result: USA's Tyler Clary wins men's 200m backstroke gold; bronze for Lochte  
#Olympics Result: USA's. Rebecca Soni wins 200m breaststroke gold, sets world record  
#Olympics Result: USA's Gabby Douglas wins women's all-around gymnastics gold.  
U.S. boosts humanitarian aid to #Syria.  
#Olympics Result: Kayla Harrison wins gold for U.S. in women's judo.  
U.S. House votes to formally reprimand Democrat Laura Richardson.  
Kofi #Annan resigns as U.N. and Arab League special envoy to #Syria.  
3 al Qaeda suspects held in Spain, authorities say.  
Chinese #badminton player disqualified from #Olympics says she is quitting.  
Accused Colorado shooter's psychiatrist reportedly warned colleagues of his behavior  
Obama authorizes covert support for Syrian rebels, sources say  
Bartender drops charges against Cuba Gooding Jr.  
Toyota recalling 760,000 RAV4's due to crash risk  
House rejects Dems' limited proposal, OKs GOP plan to keep lower tax rates for all  
#Olympics Result: U.S. women win gold, set Olympic record in 4x200m freestyle relay  
#Olympics Result: U.S. swimmer Nathan Adrian wins gold in men's 100m freestyle  
More than half of U.S. counties now disaster zones due to drought, officials say.  
Police release composite image of #Bulgaria bus bomber.  
16 now reported dead in Uganda #Ebola outbreak.  
8 badminton players thrown out of Olympics for trying to lose.  
#Olympics Result: Host nation Great Britain wins first gold in women's rowing.  
#Badminton players face charges over lackluster Olympic matches.  
Celebrated author Gore Vidal, chronicler of American life and politics, has died. He was 86.  
Passenger finds needle in sandwich, Air Canada says  
Leaders of Congress reach deal to fund government, avoid shutdown showdown  
Mark Zuckerberg's sister now works for Google  
Mark Zuckerberg's sister now works for Google  
U.S. Postal Service is on the verge of default  
#Olympics Result: #Phelps gets record 19th medal as U.S. wins 4x200m freestyle relay  
Olympic Result: #Phelps 2nd in 200m butterfly; silver gives him record-tying 18 medals #Olympics  
U.S. announces additional sanctions against #Iran  
Olympic Result: U.S. women win gold in gymnastics team final #Olympics  
Opening arguments under way in Drew Peterson murder trial.  
UK police: Girl's call about collapsed mother was hoax.  
Australian police seize $526 million worth of meth, heroin.  
Bird flu killed 160 seals off New England, scientists say.  
OLYMPIC RESULT: American Vincent Hancock wins gold in skeet.  
Area near U.S. Embassy in #Oslo, Norway, evacuated due to suspicious item.  
#India hit by 2nd huge power outage, larger than before.  
Defense Secretary #Panetta's advice for #Syria's president: "Get the hell out now."  
U.S. government watchdog: More than $200 million wasted on program to train #Iraq police.  
Matt #Grevers, Missy #Franklin win golds for U.S. in 100-meter backstroke finals.  
Man accused in #Colorado theater shooting officially charged with total of 142 counts.  
Syria's top diplomat in London has left post, British officials say.  
What's up with all the empty seats at the London Games?  
Black couple responds after white #Mississippi church refused to marry them  
Nationwide survey: U.S. gas prices up nearly a dime per gallon in 2 weeks, reversing slide.  
France wins #gold in men's 4x100-meter freestyle relay; U.S. is second, Russia third.  
#Uganda official: #Ebola went undetected because patients didn’t show typical symptoms.  
U.S. swimmer Dana #Vollmer wins #gold, sets world record in women's 100-meter butterfly.  
U.S. marathoner Desiree Davila has dropped out of the Olympic marathon due to an injury, according to a team statement.  
U.S. men's basketball beats France, 98-71. U.S. to play Tunisia on Tuesday.  
Syria vows to stomp out rebels in Aleppo.  
Hyundai recalls more than 220,000 vehicles for potential air bags flaws  
China's Ye Shiwen captured a gold medal in women's 400 individual medley, setting a new world record.  
Ryan Lochte wins #Olympics gold medal for U.S. in men’s 400-meter individual medley. Michael Phelps was fourth.  
First U.S. medal at the #Olympics is silver, after men's archery team falls to Italy.  
#Ebola virus blamed for 14 deaths in western Uganda this month, local officials say.  
First gold medal of #Olympics goes to China. Rival U.S. swimmers Michael Phelps and Ryan Lochte face off later.  
Funerals to be held for #Coloradoshooting victims Matt McQuinn and Jessica Ghawi.  
#London2012 SPOILER: 7 promising young British athletes light Olympic cauldron  
2012 #Olympics opening ceremony has begun in London. Live blog:  
Court documents: Colorado shooting suspect was patient of university psychiatrist  
Legally blind archer posts first world record of #London #Olympics  
Storms knock out power to hundreds of thousands from Plains to Northeast  
Sweep in 30 states targeting synthetic drug makers nets 167,000 pkgs of "bath salts"  
National Drought Mitigation Center: Some agricultural damage is not reversible  
Law firm representing Sandusky shower victim to sue "Penn State University, others"  
Attorneys for victim release two Jerry Sandusky voice mails  
At least 112 people reported killed in battles across #Syria.  
Suspected al Qaeda militants clash with security forces in #Iraq  
Wife of controversial Chinese politician Bo Xilai charged with murder.  
Penn State insurer files motion seeking to deny coverage  
Obama addresses gun violence in speech to National Urban League  
Puppeteer accused of chatting online about kidnapping, killing, eating children  
Cyclist who recorded his 186 mph joyride turns self in to police  
Consumer Product Safety Commission sues manufacturer of Buckyballs magnetic toy  
Senate passes Dem plan to extend Bush-era tax cuts, rejects GOP alternative  
Paparazzo involved in Bieber chase charged  
Judge threatens to have Fort Hood shooting suspect forcibly shaved  
Chinese investing in U.S. businesses at record pace  
Judge suspends Katherine Jackson as guardian of Michael Jackson's children  
9 #Olympic athletes suspended for doping, international governing body says.  
Cal Ripken Jr.'s mom found safe after being abducted, police say.  
Indian Supreme Court puts ban on tiger tourism.  
Greek athlete suspended from #Olympic team after offensive Twitter remark.  
North Korea leader Kim Jong Un married, South Korean officials say.  
Singer charged with 3rd-degree murder stemming from silicone buttocks injection  
New Orleans police get Justice Dept. mandated changes in policies on use of force, etc.  
Sherman Hemsley, #George_Jefferson on "The_Jeffersons" and "All in the Family" has died  
Killer of Jennifer Hudson's relatives gets three life sentences without parole  
6 million will lose out on Medicaid expansion, Congressional Budget Office says  
John Evans Atta Mills, the president of Ghana, has died, his chief of staff says.  
Philly priest gets 3 to 6 years in prison in abuse case.  
Egypt names U.S.-educated prime minister.  
Ex-Penn State president: I was abused as child, wouldn't ignore #Sandusky allegations.  
UK adding 1,200 troops for #Olympic security  
Latest Amelia Earhart search comes up empty.  
LA County Sheriff's Dept. probes whether Katherine #Jackson emotionally & financially mistreated by family members.  
Sally Ride, the first American woman to fly in space, has died. She was 61.  
29,339 pounds of ground beef recalled on #salmonella fears.  
Decision on whether to seek death penalty in Colorado shootings months away, DA says.  
Formal charges to be filed July 30 against Colorado shooting suspect James Holmes.  
Colorado movie theater shootings suspect James Holmes appears in court.  
Attacks in #Iraq kill at least 76 people, officials say.  
Penn State football program fined $60 million, scholarships cut from 25 to 15 a year for 4 years.  
NCAA vacates Penn State's football program of all wins from 1998 to 2011.  
#Penn State banned from bowl games for 4 years, the NCAA announces.  
Attacks in #Iraq kill at least 44 people, officials say.  
President Barack Obama said Sunday the shootings at a #Colorado movie theater were an "evil act."  
Prominent Cuban dissident Oswaldo #Paya dies in car accident.  
Law enforcement source: Semi-automatic rifle in CO theater killings jammed due to problem with 100-shot magazine.  
President #Obama says “it was the right decision” to remove Joe #Paterno statue, spokesman says.  
Survivor of #Colorado massacre says suspect's gun jammed. #theatershooting  
#Colorado massacre suspect spooked gun range manager. #theatershooting  
Source: Afghan police officer kills 3 Americans at training center.  
Ernie Els wins British Open as Adam Scott collapses.  
Pilot rescued after U.S. jet crash in Japan.  
Source: No "death penalty" for Penn State but "significant, unprecedented penalties" by NCAA.  
NCAA to announce "corrective and punitive measures" against Penn State.  
British cyclist Bradley Wiggins wins Tour de France.  
Workers have removed Paterno statue.  
Penn State will remove statue of former coach Joe Paterno from outside stadium and place it in storage.  
Investigators say they believe missing Iowa girls are alive  
Items in #Colorado shooting suspect's apartment: explosives, fireworks, black powder, liquid accelerants  
President Obama be in Aurora, #Colorado, on Sunday to visit shooting victims, family members  
Police "hopeful" major threats in #Colorado shooting suspect's apartment cleared  
Coroner releases names of #Colorado shooting victims  
Rupert #Murdoch has stepped down from string of company boards of directors  
Police chief: "Evidence of calculation and deliberation" by #Colorado shooting suspect Watch live:  
Police: Suspect in #Colorado shooting took many deliveries over past 4 months at work, home. Watch live:  
Investigators set off controlled detonation at apartment of suspect in #theatershooting.  
Bulgarian official: American sought in suicide bus attack that killed Israeli tourists  
#Colorado Gov. Hickenlooper: At least 30 people still hospitalized; 11 critical  
#Colorado governor says 58 people, not 59 as reported earlier, were injured in shooting  
Police: #theatershooting suspect purchased 6,000 rounds of ammo over Internet Watch live:  
Police now calling case of 2 missing Iowa girls an abduction  
"Dark Knight Rises" director Christopher Nolan condemns shooting as "savage" #theatershooting  
Security stepped up at theaters nationwide in wake of #Colorado shooting  
Source: Suspect in #theatershooting entered with patrons, then left to get weapons  
Police: #Colorado #theatershooting suspect told police he was "the Joker"  
Woman who escaped Toronto shooting last month has died in #Colorado #theatershooting  
Police chief: Suspect in #theatershooting wore helmet, vest, leggings, throat protector and groin protector.  
Police chief: #theatershooting suspect's apartment appears to have incendiary devices and chemicals.  
Police chief confirms that James Holmes' apartment was booby trapped.  
Police chief: 12 killed, 59 wounded in #theatershooting.  
Two Navy personnel and two Air Force reservists wounded in #theatershooting, U.S. official says.  
Aspiring sports reporter feared dead in Colorado #theatershooting.  
Colorado #theatershooting unfolds in real time on social media.  
Police release photo of #theatershooting suspect James Holmes.  
Apartment of #theatershooting suspect James Holmes has "very sophisticated" booby trap, police chief says.  
James Holmes tentatively scheduled for court appearance today in #theatershooting, officials say.  
Obama on #theatershooting: "Such violence, such evil is senseless. It is beyond reason."  
Federal officials: #Aurora gunman propped open rear door of theater, put on gear, threw tear gas and began shooting.  
James Holmes, 24, is suspect in #Aurora shootings, say two federal law enforcement officials.  
Witnesses: #Aurora gunman waited for 2 tear gas canisters to explode before firing into air and then at moviegoers.  
Suspect in #theatershooting was dressed in black, wore bulletproof vest and riot or gas mask, witnesses say.  
Police clarify number of wounded in #theatershooting is 38.  
"Items of interest" found in apartment of #Aurora suspect, says federal law enforcement source.  
#Aurora suspect is local man in his 20s, police say.  
#Aurora gunman tossed tear gas into movie theater, then sprayed audience with gunfire, police say.  
Police revise death toll in #Aurora shooting from 14 to 12.  
Colorado movie theater gunman used at least one assault rifle and two handguns, official says.  
Suspect in deadly Colorado movie theater shooting in custody, police say  
Police: 14 people killed, 50 others hurt in early morning shooting at Aurora, Colorado, theater  
Police: 10 dead, 39 others hurt in early morning shooting at Aurora, Colorado theater, KUSA reports  
Hospital: At least 20 hurt in shooting at Aurora, Colorado, movie theater early Friday  
Police responding to shooting at Aurora, Colorado, movie theater  
Two die after lightning hits #Kentucky home.  
Former hospital worker accused of transmitting #hepatitis C.  
CNN exclusive: Congressional insider trading ban might not apply to families.  
Al Franken: Comedy partner #Tom_Davis dies.  
Missing #Iowa girl's dad walks out of polygraph session because police accuse him of hurting girls, he says.  
"Queen of Soul Food" #Sylvia_Woods dead at 86.  
New #Yahoo CEO Marissa Mayer nabs $71 million pay package.  
Feds raid Trenton, New Jersey, city hall one day after searching mayor's home.  
Arrest made in #Philadelphia attempted child abduction.  
Russia, China veto U.N. sanctions on #Syria.  
Israeli PM: Bus attack "perpetrated by Hezbollah, Iran's leading terrorist proxy"  
64th Primetime #Emmys list of nominees released  
Former Egyptian intel chief Omar Suleiman dies in U.S. hospital, state-run MENA reports  
Suicide bomber carried out Wednesday's deadly bus attack on Israeli tourists, Bulgarian official says  
George_Zimmerman to Trayvon_Martin's parents: I'll pray for you daily.  
Judge rules in favor of #Tennessee #mosque, lawyers say.  
U.S. government issues another worldwide #security caution.  
GAO investigators: Some student pilots in U.S. illegally. #aviation  
President #Obama condemns "barbaric" attack on Israeli tourists in Bulgarian bus explosion.  
Israeli intelligence minister: "Very good indications" Iran involved in #Bulgaria bus terror attack that killed 6.  
USDA says 39 more counties now drought disaster areas.  
3 dead in #Bulgaria bus blast, official says.  
Israeli tourist bus explodes in Bulgaria, foreign ministry says.  
Bomb that killed Syria officials was planted, not suicide attack, rebel leader says.  
3 key members of #Syria government killed in Damascus attack, state-run media report.  
#Iceberg twice the size of Manhattan breaks off #Greenland glacier.  
Nazi war crimes suspect arrested in #Hungary.  
#Syria defense minister killed in suicide bombing, state-run media report.  
Improvised explosive device kills 11 people near Peshawar, #Pakistan, official says.  
N.Y. #Knicks say they won't match Houston Rockets' offer for Jeremy #Lin  
FDA approves new prescription diet drug called Qsymia (formerly known as Qnexa).  
Senate Republicans block #DISCLOSE_Act for second straight day.  
Nathan Van Wilkins, 44, is charged with 1 count attempted murder after a shooting at a bar in #Tuscaloosa, AL.  
#Frank_Schleck to leave #Tour_de_France after failing doping test 
#Boy_Scouts leadership affirms policy of excluding 'open or avowed' gays.  
Official: Fugitive tried to steal #SkyWest plane.  
Suspect in multiple shootings at Tuscaloosa, Alabama, bar is in custody, police say.  
Fed chairman says unemployment expected to stay above 7% through 2014.  
Security contractor concedes that failure to provide enough guards for London Olympics is "humiliating shambles."  
Clashes intensify in Syrian capital, opposition activists say  
Witness alleges she was abused by suspect in #Trayvon_Martin killing.  
Needles found in airline sandwiches, #Delta says. #aviation  
Report: #HSBC lax in preventing money laundering by cartels, terrorists.  
Google's #Marissa_Mayer named #Yahoo CEO.  
Stephen Covey, author of "The 7 Habits of Highly Effective People," has died at age 79, Idaho hospital says.  
Report: 3 men say they were abused by Jerry Sandusky in '70s and '80s -- first allegations of abuse before 1990s.  
U.S. Navy ship fires at small boat in Persian Gulf.  
Kidnapper in Egypt releases two Americans, tour guide, official says.  
President of Libyan Olympic Committee kidnapped in Tripoli, the organization says.  
S.C. woman infected by flesh-eating bacteria making "great recovery," doctor says.  
Alleged Nazi war criminal found in Hungary, Jewish rights group says.  
Tens of thousands demonstrate against nuclear power in Japan.  
Torrential rain kills at least 28 in southern #Japan.  
#Ford recalls 2013 Escape SUVs.  
Oscar-winning actress Celeste Holm has died at age 95, her niece says.  
15 killed in Kashmir bus crash.  
Bus plunges into canal in Nepal, killing at least 35 people.  
U.S. pastor kidnapped in Egypt did not know of danger, son says.  
Florida to use federal database to challenge eligibility of voters.  
Past curfew, London crew cuts power on #McCartney, #Springsteen performance  
#Aretha_Franklin says she'd like to be a judge on #American_Idol  
Penn State says it will honor deal #Paterno negotiated amid #Sandusky scandal  
U.N. team finds evidence of attack where Syrian opposition reported massacre Thursday  
Clinton arrives in Egypt for first meeting with new president.  
Police: Kerry Kennedy, daughter of Robert F. Kennedy, cited in hit-and-run wreck  
USOC: Outfits for 2014 Winter Games will be made in the United States  
Sage Stallone, son of actor #Sylvester_Stallone, has died, lawyer says  
Ruling does let Mississippi start administrative process that could eventually shut abortion clinic  
Mississippi clinic can perform abortions despite new law, judge rules  
Man found alive, 50 pounds lighter, after nearly a month in Utah desert  
#Romney on CNN: Obama camp "deceptive and dishonest" about his years with Bain  
#Lemurs found to be world's most threatened mammals  
#Richard_Zanuck, producer of #"Driving_Miss_Daisy" and other films, has died  
Syria believed to have moved some chemical weapons, U.S. official says.  
Group home worker arrested after video surfaces that shows her abusing patient, police say.  
3 Americans die as private jet crashes in southern France, official says.  
UK soccer player John Terry not guilty of racially abusing fellow soccer player.  
Billionaire's son arrested on suspicion of murder after body of American-born wife found in London home.  
1,016 counties designated as disaster areas due to #drought, authorities say.  
Landslide in British Columbia destroys three homes; four people unaccounted for.  
Delta flight to Madrid returns to New York after suspicious wires found, officials say.  
Syrian opposition reports "massacre" in Hama province  
Politicians barred from speaking at this year's 9/11 ceremony in New York  
Nike to change name of Joe #Paterno Child Development Center on Oregon campus.  
4 climbers believed missing after French avalanche found alive.  
George #Zimmerman no racist, witnesses tell FBI.  
#Paterno family issues statement in reaction to #FreehReport.  
Key players in the #FreehReport on Penn State scandal.  
NCAA reviewing #PennState report, awaiting response on compliance, ethics issues.  
Freeh: "More red flags than you can count" in #PennState abuse case.  
#FreehReport: #Sandusky seen showering with kids before May 1998.  
Key findings in the #FreehReport on #PennState abuse case.  
#FreehReport: PSU Board of Trustees did not make "reasonable inquiry" about case.  
#PennState Board of Trustees scheduled to hold 3:30 p.m. ET news conference.  
Key passages from #FreehReport on Penn State abuse scandal.  
Administrators "empowered #Sandusky to attract potential victims," report says.  
#FreehReport: Paterno, university president, athletic director failed to protect kids.  
Read the full #FreehReport on Penn State abuse case.  
#FreehReport: Paterno, ex-AD Curley decided not to report 2001 Sandusky abuse allegations.  
#FreehReport: Prepared statement on Penn State abuse scandal.  
#FreehReport: Penn State leaders showed "total disregard" for welfare of abuse victims.  
95 dead after fuel tanker spill, fire in #Nigeria.  
6 killed by #avalanche in French Alps.  
FBI interviews among evidence to be released in George #Zimmerman case.  
Penn State to release findings of review into how it handled allegations of child sex abuse.  
#Paterno kin confirm he wrote letter before death saying #Sandusky case doesn't "tarnish" Penn State.  
Lawsuit filed against FAMU, bus company, driver of bus where hazing happened.  
Judge in #Mississippi orders extension of temporary order to allow state's only #abortion clinic to stay open.  
House Republicans vote to repeal #health care law, though repeal has no chance of winning approval in Senate.  
Turbulence injures passengers, crew as flight approaches Miami. #aviation  
The president of Florida A&M University, James H. Ammons, has resigned, his spokeswoman said. #FAMU  
#Syria envoy to Iraq defects, opposition says.  
Dozens hurt as police, anti-austerity protesters clash in #Spain.  
Son of one of the world's wealthiest men arrested after wife found dead in London.  
#Thailand pardons Thai-born American jailed for insulting the monarchy, his lawyer says.  
Sheriff: Delayed e-mail from ex-banker points to suicide in court; cyanide bottle found in car.  
Socialite, songwriter Denise Rich renounces U.S. citizenship; is she off the tax hook?  
Deaths of more than 60 children in #Cambodia to be blamed on combination of pathogens, two doctors say.  
NL defeats AL 8-0; first #All-Star game shutout since NL won 6-0 in 1996  
Police: Mom who left mentally disabled daughter at bar can't be charged with crime  
NTSB: Operator knew of pipeline problems years before Michigan oil spill  
Episcopal Church largest U.S. denomination to sanction same-sex relationships  
Egyptian power struggle continues: Court halts president's decision to call parliament back into session.  
Parents charged after baby found in carry-on luggage.  
#Egypt parliament convenes briefly in gesture of defiance against military rulers.  
Congolese warlord Thomas #Lubanga sentenced for using child soldiers.  
#Eurozone ministers agree to initial 30 billion euro bailout for ailing Spanish banks.  
Forecasters: Emilia intensifies to "major” Category 3 #hurricane in Pacific Ocean.  
House panel to investigate Rep. Berkley of Nevada over whether she had conflict of interest  
Nine U.S. border patrol stations to close  
Judge throws out Lance Armstrong's lawsuit against anti-doping agency  
Feds unveil indictment against 5 men in agent's killing that led to Fast and Furious probe  
Dow drops 36 points, Nasdaq down 0.2% as investors brace for bumpy earnings season  
Last 12 months hottest ever in U.S. recorded history.  
Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes have signed divorce settlement, her attorney says.  
Obama calls on Congress to pass an extension of tax cuts for those making less than $250,000.  
#Lance_Armstrong sues doping agency to drop charges.  
Official: Palestinian leader gives OK to exhume remains of Yasser Arafat.  
Emilia to become major #hurricane in Pacific, forecasters say.  
President Obama to call for Bush tax cut extensions for lower-income Americans  
How a young reporter once made Ernest Borgnine cry  
A Georgia banker who went missing in June is being sought by federal officials for allegedly embezzling millions.  
Ernest Borgnine, who won an Academy Award for his portrayal of a butcher in 1955's "Marty," has died, his manager said.  
The six NATO troops killed by an IED on Sunday in Afghanistan were all Americans, a U.S. official said.  
Colorado governor lifts statewide fire ban.  
Six NATO troops killed in IED attack in Afghanistan.  
Roger Federer of Switzerland wins his 7th Wimbledon championship, defeating Britain’s Andy Murray in four sets. 
 
Egypt's new president calls dissolved parliament back into session.  
Kofi Annan arrives in Damascus for talks with Syrian president.  
Election results from Libya expected to be announced by the end of next week.  
Ten heat-related deaths reported in Maryland.  
Police in Arizona arrested 20, dismantled a drug trafficking cell associated with Mexico's Sinaloa Cartel.  
Serena Williams wins 5th Wimbledon title.  
Death toll tops 100 in Russia flooding.  
Man, 73, gored in leg at running of bulls in Pamplona, Spain.  
More than 1,400 pounds of cocaine (street value $98 million) seized in Hong Kong.  
Flooding in southern Russia kills at least 53 people.  
#Hurricane Daniel forms in Pacific; winds at 75 mph.  
Reports: Justin #Bieber cited for speeding after freeway chase with paparazzi.  
California Senate OKs initial funding for nation’s first high-speed rail system  
U.S. Secretary of State Hillary Clinton in Kabul on unannounced visit, will meet with President Karzai  
Tweet Suspected U.S. drone kills 20 people in North Waziristan, on Pakistan-Afghanistan border, Pakistani official says  
President #Obama signs transportation funding and student loan bill passed by Congress last week  
Archdiocese of Philadelphia bars two more priests amid allegations of child sex abuse  
“Happy Days” actors settle lawsuit with CBS over merchandising payments  
George #Zimmerman released from jail day after Florida judge set $1 million bond  
Andy Murray is first British man to reach a Wimbledon singles final in 74 years.  
Andy Griffith died of heart attack, death certificate says.  
Police chief sought band's suspension before #FAMU hazing death, document says.  
7 men arrested in anti-terror operation, UK police say.  
2 dead in Great Smoky Mountains National Park storm.  
U.S. employers created 80,000 jobs in June; unemployment rate unchanged at 8.2%.  
China lifts ban on lesbians giving blood.  
Clinton slams Russia, China over their lack of support for action on #Syria.  
Top #Syrian general reportedly defects to Turkey.  
Ex-dictators found guilty of stealing babies during Argentina's "dirty war"  
#Zimmerman does "not have anywhere near" assets to post bail, attorney says  
#Zimmerman may have been planning to flee country, judge says; bond set at $1M  
Costa Concordia captain freed from house arrest in Italy.  
#WikiLeaks begins releasing 2.4 million #Syria e-mails.  
Florida judge sets $1 million bond for George #Zimmerman in Trayvon Martin case.  
"Series of errors" by pilots contributed to 2009 Air France crash, officials say.  
#WikiLeaks releases 2.4 million #Syria e-mails.  
#Japan attributes nuclear crisis to failures in Japanese culture.  
Officials to re-count 54.5% of ballots in Mexico's presidential election  
Police in Montreal identify severed head as that of student slain in May  
Arafat's widow wants his body exhumed after his personal effects test radioactive  
Female F1 driver De Villota loses eye after test crash.  
Joey "Jaws" Chestnut wins annual hot dog eating contest with a total of 68.  
Sonya "The Black Widow" Thomas eats record 45 hotdogs, wins annual women's contest.  
Double-amputee Pistorius earns #Olympic sprint place.  
Suspect arrested in alleged plot against former Spanish leader.  
Former #Barclays CEO defends bank over interest rate scandal.  
#India floods leave 95 dead, millions homeless.  
#Arafat belongings test high for radioactivity, scientist says.  
Scientists almost certain they have proven existence of #Higgs boson.  
95 dead, 2 million homeless in #India flooding.  
Unruly JetBlue pilot found not guilty by reason of insanity  
Former commerce secretary won't face charges stemming from wrecks last month  
Lopez Obrador demands recount of ballots in Mexico's presidential election  
At-home rapid HIV test gets FDA approval  
CNN poll: Public's optimism on economy growing  
Police raid home, offices of former French President Sarkozy in campaign finance probe  
Pakistan re-opening #Afghanistan supply route, Sec. of State Clinton says.  
Actor Andy #Griffith dies at 86, N.C. law enforcement source confirms.  
Syrian leader says he regrets downing of Turkish warplane.  
Scientists say they're closer to proving existence of Higgs boson or "God particle."  
#Torture systematic in #Syria, Human Rights Watch report says.  
#Paterno family attorney wants all #Penn_State e-mails in #Sandusky case released  
Runner-up refuses to concede Mexico's presidential election to Peña Nieto  
F/A-18 crash in Virginia Beach in April blamed on double engine failure  
Air Force grounds all firefighting-equipped C-130s after crash  
 Sprinter pulls out of runoff after tying for Olympic spot. CNN working to confirm.  
Michael Phelps withdraws from London Olympics 200m freestyle race.  
4 international court staff members freed from detention in #Libya.  
Millions still without power amid record heat wave.  
Abducted aid workers freed in Kenya, official says.  
U.S. sprinters to hold runoff Monday after tying for Olympic spot  
Aimee Copeland expected to leave the hospital today  
Enrique Peña Nieto is the projected winner of Mexico's presidential election, officials announced  
Mississippi's only abortion clinic will stay open -- for now.  
Vote-counting begins in Mexican elections.  
Tiger Woods wins 74th PGA Tour event to pass Jack Nicklaus on all-time wins list.  
Spain defeats Italy 4-0 in the #Euro2012 final.  
#Turkey scrambles jets as #Syria choppers fly near border.  
Mexicans head to polls to pick new president.  
Explosions at 2 churches in #Kenya kill 16, wound 40, Red Cross says.  
High Park Fire 100% contained; Waldo Canyon Fire near Colorado Springs 45% contained  
Former Israeli Prime Minister Yitzhak Shamir died Saturday, the Israeli prime minister's office said.  
World powers forge agreement for a transition to end violence in Syria.  
8 people were killed by downed trees and power lines in Friday night storms in Midwest, Atlantic Seaboard.  
Stolen Salvador Dali painting returned to New York gallery.  
Millions without power in nine states. Forecast calls for more extreme heat.  
#Egypt swears in first democratically elected president.  
Dallas NAACP seeks end to Texas Lottery, saying it drains cash of low-income players
 
Students who bullied bus monitor suspended from school, given community service  
U.S. Anti-Doping Agency files charges against #Lance_Armstrong  
Deputy attorney general says he will not prosecute AG Eric Holder for contempt  
Defense official: Ft. Bragg shooting victim was Lt. Col., suspect was in his unit  
Katie Holmes files for divorce from Tom Cruise, attorney says.  
House approves new highway funding and student loan bill.  
Passengers and crew foil plane hijack attempt in China.  
WikiLeaks' #Assange will remain in UK Ecuadorian Embassy, spokeswoman says.  
Chances are if you live in the U.S., you're going to feel the heat Friday  
Body discovered Thursday at a home destroyed in the Waldo Canyon Fire burning on the outskirts of Colorado Springs, Colorado, police say 
Soldier dead, two others injured in #Fort_Bragg shooting.  
31 victims identified in widening Air Force sex scandal.  
At least 346 homes on 34 streets in Colorado Springs, Colorado, have been destroyed by the Waldo Canyon #wildfire.  
House passes a measure also authorizing civil action against AG Eric_Holder.  
Attorney General Eric Holder dismisses contempt vote as "politically motivated."  
#Holder on contempt finding: "A crass effort and a grave disservice to the American people."  
#RIM will fire 5,000 employees and delay its upcoming operating system.  
Attorney General #Eric_Holder found in contempt of Congress.  
UK police demand #WikiLeaks' #Assange leave embassy, go to police station.  
Mitt Romney promises to repeal health care law if elected president.  
Roberts wrote individual mandate could be seen as tax and within congressional powers.  
Chief Justice John Roberts voted with majority in 5-4 health care decision.  
Supreme Court ruling upholding health care law was 5-4 decision.  
Correction: The Supreme Court backs all parts of President Obama’s health care law.  
Supreme Court strikes down law making it a crime to lie about military medals earned.  
Supreme Court strikes down individual mandate portion of health care law.  
Correction: CNN does not have details on when President Obama will make health care comments. 
President Obama to speak soon after Supreme Court health care ruling.  
Blast shakes central Damascus, Syrian government and opposition officials say.  
7 years for man who stole historic documents and sold them to museums, libraries  
Florida man who chewed face off of another was not on "bath salts," tests show  
T-Mobile USA's CEO resigns  
Two dead in Florida as a result of Tropical Storm #Debby, officials say  
Speaker John Boehner says U.S. House will proceed with contempt vote against Eric Holder  
Coast Guard investigating whether stowaways in container on vessel in N.J. port  
Britain's Queen Elizabeth shakes hands with ex-IRA commander Martin McGuinness  
Drake, Chris Brown offered $1 million each to duke it out  
Stockton, California, may become largest city in country to declare #bankruptcy after officials couldn't reach deal with creditors 
32,000 #evacuated in fast-moving #ColoradoSprings wildfire.  
Ship carrying about 150 people sinks in the waters between #Australia and #Indonesia, Australian Maritime Safety Authority says 
CNN projects Sen. Orrin Hatch will win Tuesday's GOP Senate primary in Utah 
Family releases photo of flesh-eating patient #Aimee_Copeland going outside for first time in 7 weeks.  
Filmmaker and writer #Nora_Ephron has died, her son Jacob Bernstein told The New York Times. She was 71.  
#BCS panel approves college #football playoff plan.  
NHC: #Tropical_Storm_Debby has been downgraded to a tropical depression.  
South Carolina #gas falls below $3 a gallon.  
NHC: #Tropical_Storm_Debby made landfall near Steinhatchee, Florida, on Tuesday afternoon.  
Global #cybercrime crackdown yields 24 arrests.  
Evacuations ordered in #Florida as #Debby soaks state.  
#NATO condemns in "strongest terms" #Syria downing of Turkish warplane.  
3 police killed in #Mexico City international airport shooting.  
#Tropical_Storm_Debby dumps 5 inches of rain per hour on parts of the Panhandle.  
Source: House vote to hold Attorney General #Holder in contempt set for Thursday.  
#FBI: Nationwide child #prostitution sweep leads to 104 arrests, 79 children rescued.  
#Stocks end lower on fear about Europe's debt crisis. Dow drops 138 points. Nasdaq falls 2%, S&P slides 1.6%.  
Attorney General "concerned" by part of #Arizona immigration law left in place.  
#Florida governor declares state of emergency as TS #Debby pounds state.  
Obama "pleased" Supreme Court has struck down parts of #Arizona immigration law.  
TS #Debby forecast to soak Florida as it crosses state.  
Romney: Obama has failed to show leadership on immigration.  
#Arizona Sheriff Arpaio: We'll continue to enforce laws  
#Arizona Sheriff Arpaio: We'll continue to enforce laws  
#Arizona senators say key part of immigration law remains in place.  
Arizona Gov. Jan Brewer calls immigration ruling "victory for the rule of law."  
Supreme Court will not rule on challenge to health care reform law today.  
Court rules government has right to block Arizona from holding suspected illegal immigrants.  
Supreme Court upholds some parts of #Arizona immigration law, rejects others.  
Supreme Court rules juveniles sentenced to life have right to seek parole.  
Tropical Storm Debby churns in Gulf of Mexico  
Saudi Arabia to let its female athletes compete in the Olympics for the first time  
'Obamacare:' The word that defined the health care debate  
2 tornadoes tied to #Tropical_Storm_Debby struck central Florida's Highland County, killing 1 person.  
High winds from #Tropical_Storm_Debby force the closure of Florida's Sunshine Skyway bridge.  
#Alex_Trebek suffers mild heart attack.  
Egyptian President-Elect Mohamed #Morsi thanked "martyrs" who led the revolution that helped oust Mubarak.  
U.S. condemns #Syria downing of Turkish fighter jet as "brazen and unacceptable act."  
Louisiana governor declares state of emergency as Tropical Storm Debby approaches.  
Muslim Brotherhood-backed candidate Mohamed Morsi wins #Egypt presidential election.  
Turkey calls the shooting down of its jet fighter by Syria a hostile act.  
Turkey finds jet shot down by Syria, TV reports.  
Tropical Storm Debby has formed in the Gulf of Mexico, the National Hurricane Center reported Saturday.  
#Sandusky defense wanted to withdraw before start of trial, one attorney says.  
Sandusky placed on suicide watch, his attorney says.  
8 killed, 40 injured as bus carrying Czech vacationers crashes in Croatia.  
Palestinian boy killed as Israel, militants trade fire at Gaza border.  
Jerry #Sandusky found guilty on 45 of 48 counts related to sexual abuse of boys.  
#Syria state TV: Turkish military jet shot down after entering Syrian airspace.  
#Paraguay Senate votes after impeachment trial to remove President Fernando Lugo.  
Philly jury convicts Monsignor William Lynn of endangering a child's welfare.  
Partial verdict reached in #Philadelphia priest sex abuse trial.  
26 killed in #Afghanistan hotel attack, authorities say.  
Ahmed Shafik will be named Egypt's new president Sunday, news agency reports.  
U.S., South Korea forces stage biggest live-fire drill since Korean War.  
Minnesota, Wisconsin report widespread damage, closed roads in wake of floods.  
Police in Kabul say they've stormed hotel and rescued 45 civilians  
Civilians held hostage in deadly attack by Taliban militants on hotel near Kabul  
Miami #Heat win #NBA_championship. Triple double for #LeBron_James  
Congress investigates possible safety lapses at #CDC lab.  
#Afghan, #NATO troops try to push back insurgent attack on a hotel outside #Kabul.  
#Moody's downgrades 15 major global #banks, including #BofA, #JPMorganChase. 
Attorneys: Adopted son of #Sandusky had been ready to testify he had been abused.  
S.C. mom who had #flesh-eating #bacteria upgraded to good condition.  
#Oil prices dip below $80 a #barrel, reaching eight-month low.  
Big drop for #stocks -- #Dow sheds 252 points on #banking fears.  
#Senate OKs huge #farm bill that changes payment structures in place since Depression.  
#Twitter #outage is longest service disruption since October.  
Man charged with bomb threat against #Tennessee #Islamic center.  
Jerry #Sandusky child rape case goes to jury.  
Feds seek help to identify endangered teen.  
U.S. Secretary of Commerce John #Bryson resigns.  
#Paraguay president Lugo faces impeachment after deadly clash.  
Supreme Court rules for broadcasters, against #FCC in TV #indecency case.  
Indonesian court sentences #Bali bomber to 20 years in prison.  
#Norway prosecutors want accused mass killer Breivik sent to mental institution.  
3 counts dropped against Jerry #Sandusky; still faces 48 in child rape trial.  
George Zimmerman says Trayvon Martin attacked him in newly released police interview.  
Ship with about 200 people aboard capsizes off Australia  
Moon may have frozen water in south pole crater, study says  
Artist #LeRoyNeiman has died in New York, his publicist says. He was 91.  
Governor's office: #Oracle CEO #LarryEllison buys #Hawaiian island of #Lana'i.  
"Dating Game Killer" extradited to New York to face new murder charges. #Dating_game_killer  
"Dating Game Killer" extradited to #NewYork to face two murder charges from 1970s.  
New La. law: #Sex_offenders must list status on #Facebook, other social media.  
Alert level raised on #volcano in #Alaska.  
Spokeswoman for #Sanford, Florida, Police Chief #BillLee say he's been fired.  
#NFL commissioner Goodell announces anti-bounty steps.  
#Yemen officials: 17 militants killed in an airstrike on an #alQaeda hideout.  
#SanFrancisco firefighters battle a three-alarm #blaze at waterfront pier.  
#Hamas says its military wing has agreed to a cease-fire with #Israel.  
House panel recommends AG Eric #Holder be cited for contempt.  
#Flooding in #Minnesota forces evacuations; zoo animals drown.  
U.S. #stocks end mixed after #Fed announces move to help revive economy.  
#Rio+20 Summit opens; U.N.'s Ban Ki-Moon warns time "is running out."
 
#Egypt officials delay results of presidential runoff.  
Report: Jury deadlocked on 4 counts in Pa. priest sex-abuse case.  
Defense rests in #Sandusky trial without calling him to the stand.  
Antonis #Samaras sworn in as head of new #Greece government  
President Obama asserts executive privilege over "Fast and Furious" document.  
Agreement reached on terms for new #Greece government, party spokesman says.  
Police seek #WikiLeaks founder Assange's arrest after asylum claim.  
Armed man holds 4 hostage in bank in Toulouse, France  
#Sandusky is fully prepped and ready if defense puts him on stand, source says  
TEPCO admits it "did not have enough measures to prevent" Fukushima accident  
#Heat beat #Thunder 104-98 to go up 3 games to 1 in #NBA_Finals  
8 states to be under triple digit #heat advisory Wednesday.  
#Obama at end of #G-20: #EU leaders have "heightened urgency" on financial woes.  
A victim of the "Green River Killer" identified 29 years after disappearance.  
#U.N. halts activities of monitors in #Syria, but they're staying put for now.  
Latest #Mubarak report from #Egypt: Ex-president in a #coma, his attorney says.  
Top military official tells CNN that Hosni #Mubarak is not dead but is in critical condition.  
In #Texas, no grand jury indictment against dad who killed daughter's alleged abuser.  
Hosni #Mubarak "clinically dead," Egyptian state news agency says.  
#TropicalStorm Chris forms in the #Atlantic.  
Which countries are doing best in fighting human #trafficking? Report out.  
Wife of Jerry #Sandusky testifies: Children would often sleep at their house.  
#Southern_Baptists elect first black president.  
U.S. stocks finish higher on hopes of Fed action. Dow gains 96 points.  
Former Egyptian President Hosni #Mubarak has stroke and is in critical condition, state-run Nile TV reported. 
Jerry Sandusky's wife, #Dottie_Sandusky takes stand in former coach's child rape trial. #Sandusky  
Former Egyptian President Hosni #Mubarak revived after cardiac arrest, spokesman says.  
Julian #Assange requests asylum in Ecuador, foreign minister says.  
Canadian porn actor #Luka_ Magnotta accused of killing and dismembering man pleads not guilty in Montreal court.  
Insurgents breach U.S. military outpost in Afghanistan, officials say.  
#Colorado firefighters facing more wind, heat.  
Ship suspected of carrying arms to #Syria returning to #Russia, UK says.  
Ex-Rutgers student convicted of bullying roommate is released.  
18 reported dead after clash between Kurdish rebels and Turkish forces.  
Google says it removed 640 terrorist videos from YouTube in last 6 months of 2011  
Microsoft unveils 'Surface' tablet to rival iPad  
Suspect in Canada dismemberment killing to appear in court on Tuesday  
Jury finds Roger #Clemens not guilty on all counts in perjury trial  
Officials: Gunmen in Afghan police uniforms attack NATO troops, kill one  
Jury reaches verdict in Roger #Clemens perjury trial; expected to be announced at 4:30 p.m.  
Jail phone transcripts show #Zimmerman, wife discussing finances in code  
Official: #Iraq ambassador nominee withdraws amid claims of questionable conduct  
Obama: #Putin and I agree political steps needed to stop #Syria violence  
Sen. John McCain calls for U.S. military leadership on #Syria  
Militant Islamist group claims responsibility for deadly church bombings.  
Defense opens its case in #Sandusky trial.  
At least 15 dead in Iraq suicide bombing.  
Suspect in Canada dismemberment killing extradited.  
G-20 summit kicks off in Mexico.  
Saudi Arabia names new crown prince.  
Police investigate assault claim made against tennis star Nalbandian.  
After a week of graphic testimony, Jerry Sandusky set to present his defense  
Miami #Heat defeat Oklahoma City Thunder 91-85 in Game 3 of the #NBA finals.  
#Webb_Simpson won the 112th U.S. Open golf championship, finishing the four-day event at one shot over par.  
Muslim Brotherhood claims #Mohamed_Morsi has defeated foe #Ahmed_Shafik for #Egypt presidency; results not final.  
Zookeeper killed by #wolves in #Sweden.  
#Radiohead drum tech killed in #stage_collapse.  
Leader of Greece's Syriza party, congratulated New Democracy for its projected 1st-place finish in parliamentary vote.  
Leader of Greece's pro-bailout party says projected 1st place finish in elections "a victory for all Europe."  
Complete Greek exit polls: Pro-bailout New Democracy party has slight edge over left-wing Syriza coalition.  
Greece's center-right New Democracy party and left-wing Syriza coalition lead parliamentary elections, exit polls say.  
Rodney King found dead in a swimming pool. He was 47.  
Rodney King, whose videotaped beating by police led to the 1992 L.A. riots, is found dead.  
3 church bombings in northern Nigeria kill 15, injure 32.  
Travis Baumgartner, accused of killing 3 people in Canada, was arrested by U.S. border officials, police said.  
Stage collapses ahead of sold-out Radiohead concert in Toronto, killing one person.  
Four Japanese climbers are feared dead following an avalanche on Mount McKinley in Alaska, National Park Service said.  
Elementary school principal arrested on drug charges.  
Paraguayan president replaces interior minister and police chief after deadly clashes with peasants.  
Obama administration says Syria has reached "critical juncture."  
Violence forces U.N. monitors to suspend operations in Syria.  
32 killed, 68 wounded in two car bombings targeting Shiite pilgrims in Baghdad, police say.  
Myanmar's Aung San Suu Kyi delivers Nobel speech, 21 years after she won peace prize.  
Carlotta weakens to tropical storm over mountains of southern Mexico.  
Saudi Crown Prince Nayef Abdulaziz has died outside the kingdom, Saudi state TV reports.  
China launches spacecraft carrying nation's first female astronaut to space.  
At least 14 killed, 26 hurt in bomb blast near market in Pakistan  
Polls open in Egypt for presidential runoff election, according to state-run TV  
Hurricane #Carlotta makes landfall in Mexico, packing 90 mph winds  
Tiger Woods takes share of lead at U.S. Open, aims for first major since 2008. #USOpen  
Georgia man is charged with murder after authorities say he put vodka in his baby's bottle, leading to her death.  
Men in masks attempted to break into the Pennsylvania home of Democratic Rep. Robert Brady, congressional spokeswoman says. 
Reaction to immigration policy change: Tears of joy from student; skepticism from Republican senator.  
Carlotta becomes hurricane off Mexico with 80-mph winds.  
Immigration policy change will cover people younger than 30 who came to U.S. before age 16.  
Obama administration will stop deporting young people who came to U.S. as children of illegal immigrants if they meet certain requirements. 
German police: 'Forest Boy' tale is a hoax.  
Syrian government warns possible suicide bombings at mosques  
Activists call for protests ahead of Egyptian presidential vote  
#Heat defeat #Thunder 100-96 to even #NBA_Finals at 1 win each  
Last #Tokyo gas attack suspect may be in custody.  
Firefighters making progess on that massive #Colorado #wildfire.  
#Obama signs beam of One World Trade Center.  
#HillaryClinton on North Korea's Kim Jung Un: He "has a choice."  
#Sandusky trial in recess until Monday.  
#Dow closes up 153 points on hopes of Fed stimulus.  
Alleged victims testify as #Sandusky prosecution prepares to rest.  
Officer who investigated prior allegations wanted charges in 1998 against #Sandusky  
Egypt's military rulers claim to have full legislative control after court rules to dissolve parliament.  
Highest court in #Egypt calls for parliament to be dissolved  
2,000th U.S. death reported in Operation Enduring Freedom  
#Matt_Cain throws #perfect_game in S.F. #Giants 10-0 win over Houston Astros  
FBI joins search for serial rapist in Cleveland  
#Lance_Armstrong rips new doping charges as "vendetta."  
Severe turbulence injures five on United Airlines flight. #aviation  
More evidence to be released in #Trayvon_Martin case, judge rules.  
Feds drop remaining charges against #John_Edwards days after his corruption trial ended in an acquittal & mistrial.  
U.S. #stocks end lower on European debt fears. Dow loses 79 points. Nasdaq falls 0.9%, S&P slides 0.7%.  
Soccer body takes tough line on Russia over #Euro2012 fans  
'Some success, some failure' in Colorado wildfire fight, official says  
North Dakota voters: University can drop Fighting #Sioux name  
JPMorgan CEO #Dimon tells senators: 'I can't publicly defend the trade' that led to loss of billions  
47 killed, 100 wounded in 7 car bombings in 2 hours in Iraq  
Poll taken in 21 countries: Obama's policies weaken support for U.S.  
#Thunder beat #Heat 105-94 in Game 1 of #NBA_Finals  
Suspect sought in stabbing, sexual assault on hiker in Great Smokies.  
Triple murder suspect accused of killing 3, wounding others at #Auburn University has turned himself in.  
#Casey_Anthony to #Piers_Morgan: "I'm ashamed in many ways of the person that I was."  
George Zimmerman's wife, #Shellie_Zimmerman, arrested on perjury charge.  
#Stocks end higher, rebounding from previous session's losses. Dow adds 161 points. Nasdaq and S%P gain 1.2%.  
#Georgia official: #KKK won't be allowed to adopt highway.  
'Whitey' Bulger's girlfriend sentenced to 8 years.  
A top U.N. official says Syria now in civil war.  
Attorney General Eric Holder rejects Republican call to resign.  
"Victim 1" details Sandusky's alleged sexual advances. "I spaced, I didn't know what to do," he says.  
Manhunt continues after house search comes up empty in Auburn-area killings.  
Court document: Former Penn State official Gary Schultz "created, maintained, and possessed" secret file on Sandusky.  
Eleven bodies found, 13 missing after boat carrying Haitian migrants runs into trouble on way to U.S.  
Justice Dept. to sue Florida over plan to purge voter rolls ahead of 2012 elections  
Los Angeles #Kings beat the New Jersey Devils 6-1 to win the National Hockey League's #Stanley_Cup . 
Tunnel accident near Las Vegas kills one worker, injures another.  
Commerce Sec'y John #Bryson to take medical leave of absence after allegedly causing 2 car accidents after seizure.  
Cuban boxing legend #Teofilo_Stevenson dead at 60.  
After more than 30 years, coroner rules #dingo to blame for Australian baby's death.  
Police surround Montgomery, Alabama, home in #Auburn killings, believing suspect is inside.  
Ex-Rutgers student #Dharun_Ravi appeals bullying conviction.  
#Stocks turn sharply lower, erasing earlier gains. Dow falls 142 points. Nasdaq drops 1.7%, S&P loses 1.3%.  
#Nobel_prize to be cut 20% in 2012.  
Navy #drone crashes in #Maryland.  
Sheriff: Texas father catches man sexually assaulting his daughter, 4, and punches him to death.  
KKK chapter wants to adopt stretch of Georgia highway.  
Colorado wildfire nearly doubles in size. It looks like volcanic eruption, one resident says.  
Prosecutor refers to Jerry Sandusky as 'serial predator' in opening statements of his trial.  
FBI: Overall U.S. violent crime dropped 4% in 2011, but number of murders in small towns jumped.  
Commerce secretary, who was involved in hit-run accidents, had seizure.  
Rafael #Nadal beats Novak #Djokovic to claim record seventh French Open title  
Former Egyptian leader Hosni Mubarak in "full coma."  
U.S. Secretary of Commerce John Bryson gets felony hit-and-run citation following car accident in California. 
"Once," "Porgy and Bess" big winners at Tony Awards  
Colorado #wildfire doubles in size on Sunday.  
Parts of Florida get 20 inches of rain in a 24-hour period.  
3 dead, 3 wounded in shooting near Auburn University.  
3 dead, 3 wounded in shooting near Auburn University.  
Deadly blast hits church in central Nigeria. There appears to be a large number of casualties, including children.  
Kenyan minister dies in helicopter crash  
Timothy Bradley gets split decision against Manny Pacquiao to win WBO welterweight championship  
The Miami Heat defeated the Boston Celtics 101-88 in Game 7 to advance to NBA Finals.  
N. J. #Devils defeat L.A. #Kings 2-1 to force #Stanley_Cup finals game 6  
Comedian Tommy #Chong says he's fighting prostate cancer  
#Union_Rags, ridden by John Velazquez, wins #Belmont Stakes  
Man wanted in shooting deaths of Alabama twins and their babysitter is arrested.  
Spain seeks $125 billion in EU aid for banks.  
Denmark stuns Dutch with 1-0 victory at Euro 2012.  
Maria Sharapova beats Sara Errani to win French Open final.  
Somali Islamists offer 10 camels as bounty for Obama.  
Warren Buffett lunch sells for record $3,456,789.  
Prince Philip released from London hospital after treatment for bladder infection.  
Six pitchers from Seattle Mariners combine for no-hitter against L.A. Dodgers; 10th combined no-hitter in MLB history  
Opposition: Doctors blocked from aiding injured after shelling kills 20 in Syria  
Actress Lindsay #Lohan briefly hospitalized after car crash on way to California set.  
Attorney General Holder assigns prosecutors to investigate White House leaks  
Sen. Marco #Rubio of Florida wins VP straw poll at conservative conference.  
Hosts of #Car_Talk retiring from hit show  
Ohio school shooting suspect pleads not guilty; bail set at $1 million  
Fort Hood shooting hearing postponed when accused Maj. Hasan shows up with beard  
14 people in 6 states sickened with E. coli.  
Megachurch pastor Creflo Dollar arrested in domestic disturbance case.  
Judge rejects motions to dismiss charges in Jerry #Sandusky molestation case.  
I'll Have Another scratched from Belmont; no Triple Crown.  
18 rescued in federal child porn raids, officials say.  
Rower Sarah #Outen rescued after trouble on solo Pacific crossing.  
#Heat rout #Celtics 98-79 to force NBA playoff game 7  
#Boy_Scouts to study ban on gay leaders  
Guitarist #Bob_Welch an apparent suicide victim, police say  
FAMU Board of Trustees issues vote of 'no confidence' in president  
Plane forced to land after violating presidential airspace.  
2,000 players unite in suing #NFL over head injuries.  
UN monitors attacked while trying to reach scene of a massacre in #Syria, sec. gen. says.  
George Zimmerman's new bail hearing in Trayvon Martin case set for June 29.  
U.S. Defense Secretary Leon Panetta arrives in Kabul for talks as Afghan President Hamid Karzai condemns NATO airstrike  
Oklahoma City Thunder defeat San Antonio Spurs 107-99 to advance to NBA Finals.  
New Jersey #Devils defeat L.A. #Kings 3-1; still down 3 games to 1 in #Stanley_Cup Finals  
Vacuum cleaner may have started fire aboard sub, Navy says  
Opposition: At least 78 killed in Syrian village; half are women, children  
Days after ending worst month in 2 years, stocks log best daily gains of 2012  
Official: FBI looks into possible WH leaks involving cyberwarfare against Iran  
Driver found guilty of homicide in texting-while-driving case  
Science fiction author Ray #Bradbury died last night, his representative says.  
U.S. helicopter believed shot down in #Afghanistan; 2 dead  
Big anti-drug sweep at Puerto Rico's main airport reported.  
Suicide bombers hit busy market in southern Afghanistan; at least 21 dead and dozens hurt  
#Sheryl_Crow: Noncancerous brain tumor is a 'bump in the road.'  
Republican Gov. #Scott_Walker of Wisconsin will survive a bitter recall effort, CNN projects.  
Exit polls show tight race in #Wisconsin recall race. Polls close at 9 p.m. ET.  
A distress call from Africa's Sahel: Millions might starve. #hunger  
Human remains sent to schools in #Canada.  
#Senate Republicans block #pay_equity bill.  
Former Dodgers manager #Tommy_Lasorda suffers mild heart attack.  
#Dow snaps 4-session losing streak, gaining 25 points, as U.S. #stocks advance on positive economic report.  
Grand jury indicts Ohio school shooting suspect on 3 counts of aggravated murder. #crime  
2 sisters from Texas, family from Connecticut perish in #Nigeria crash.  
#FBI adds alleged murderer and rapist Fidel_Urbina to Ten Most Wanted Fugitives list.  
U.S. official confirms No. 2 leader of al Qaeda killed by U.S. drone strike in Pakistan.  
Federal appeals court won't hear same-sex marriage case in California. Case could go to U.S. Supreme Court.  
Airline's license suspended after deadly Nigeria crash.  
Montreal police still looking for missing head, hand and foot in dismemberment case.  
Racetrack workers threaten strike in days leading up to Saturday's Belmont Stakes.  
Suspect in Canadian dismemberment case won't fight extradition, Berlin police official says.  
Lawyers for George #Zimmerman delay request for new bond hearing.  
Jury will not be sequestered in #Sandusky trial.  
Jury selection begins in #Sandusky trial.  
Drone attack in Pakistan targets No. 2 man in al Qaeda, U.S. official says.  
Drone attack in Pakistan targets No. 2 man in al Qaeda, U.S. official says.  
Data, cockpit voice recorders found in #Nigeria jet crash.  
#Obama wins endorsement from Raul Castro's daughter.  
#Canada dismemberment suspect was in cafe reading about self before arrest, worker says.  
Prince Philip, the husband of Britain's Queen Elizabeth II, hospitalized with bladder infection.  
Owner of Internet cafe alerted Berlin police who made arrest in Canadian dismemberment case, employee says.  
Police in Germany arrest Canadian porn actor accused of dismembering man, Canadian Broadcasting Corporation reports.  
Airport standoff ends in Tripoli, militia group says.  
Militia group seizes control of international airport in Tripoli, Libya, security source says.  
Russia's #Putin and others discuss #Syria and other matters Live:  
Pilot of doomed flight that crashed in a neighborhood in Lagos, Nigeria, was an American  
George Zimmerman's lawyers to request new bond hearing Monday to try to get him out of jail  
#Olivia_Culpo, Miss Rhode Island, won the title of #Miss_USA 2012.  
6.6-magnitude #earthquake struck off the southern coast of #Panama.  
#Tiger_Woods ties legend Jack Nicklaus with dramatic 73rd PGA Tour victory.  
Nigerian emergency management official: There are no survivors of Dana Air crash in #Lagos #Nigeria #aviation  
George Zimmerman surrenders to authorities in Florida.  
New charges of money laundering filed against Mubarak's sons as protests grow.  
153 aboard plane that crashed into residential neighborhood in Lagos, Nigeria, rescue official says.  
Media reports: Officials in Nigeria confirm a
passenger plane has crashed in Lagos.  
Police in Paris searching for self-proclaimed porn star suspected of killing and cutting up student in Canada.  
Richard Dawson, longtime host of "Family Feud," dead at 79, his son said in a statement.  
Syrian president denies government role in Houla massacre.  
Tens of thousands attend rainy river pageant on the Thames for Queen Elizabeth II's Diamond Jubilee.  
Church bombing kills 3, wounds 35 in northern Nigeria.  
Syria's Bashar al-Assad to deliver televised address Sunday to first legislative session of the New People's Assembly  
#Thunder defeat #Spurs 109-103 to even NBA playoff series at 2 games each  
Dismemberment suspect accused of murder, threatening Canadian prime minister  
New Mexico wildfire burns 227,000 acres -- 1.5 times the size of Chicago  
Ten people killed after cargo plane missed runway of airport in Accra, Ghana, and crashed into a bus, Mayor Alfred Vanderpuije said. 
At least 61 hurt in protests throughout Egypt after acquittals of Mubarak aides  
Panetta: U.S. will enhance military cooperation with China, majority of U.S. warships will move to Asia.  
Egypt's general prosecutor orders immediate transfer of Mubarak to Tura maximum security prison, says Egyptian state TV  
Minor skirmishes reported among riot police, protesters outside court where #Mubarak was sentenced.  
Egypt's former Interior Minister Habib El Adly, who served in #Mubarak regime, sentenced to life in prison.  
Hosni #Mubarak cleared of corruption charges. Judge dropped charges against Mubarak's sons, Gamal and Alaa.  
Fights have broken out in the #Egypt courtroom after news of Hosni #Mubarak's life sentence  
Former Egyptian leader Hosni Mubarak sentenced to life in prison for death of protesters during last year's Arab Spring  
#Johan_Santana throws first #no-hitter in Mets history - 8-0 win over Cardinals  
Murder suspects recaptured 2 miles from jail  
Judge says #Zimmerman misrepresented his finances when bond was set in April  
Judge gives #Zimmerman 48 hours to surrender to Seminole County, Fla., Sheriff  
Bond revoked for George #Zimmerman, charged with 2nd-degree murder in death of #Trayvon Martin  
Prosecutors ask judge to revoke bond for George Zimmerman.  
Zimmerman defense, prosecution unite to oppose release of info in Trayvon Martin case.  
U.N. rights watchdog wants independent probe of massacre in Houla, #Syria.  
Police release identity of victim in grisly body parts killing.  
Hard evidence was elusive in John Edwards case, jurors say.  
Snigdha Nandipati of Calif. wins #National_Spelling_Bee by nailing "guetapens"  
Police: Hero saved several Seattle cafe patrons Wednesday as gunman opened fire  
Best Western hotels rolling out UV sterilization, black light inspections  
Google doesn't have to pay Oracle for violating 37 Java copyrights, judge rules  
#John Edwards says he did nothing illegal but, "I did an awful, awful lot that was wrong" Live:  
Jurors find #Edwards not guilty on 1 count, judge declares mistrial on other 5  
Dow, Nasdaq finish in red, ending worst month in 2 years  
Judge orders #Edwards jury to continue deliberations after it deadlocks on 5 of 6 counts  
#Edwards jury reaches unanimous verdict on 1 count; judge calls a recess  
Lawyers for John Edwards ask for mistrial after jurors announced they reached a verdict on only one of six counts.  
The jury in the John Edwards trial has only reached a unanimous decision on one charge so far.  
A jury has reached a verdict in the John #Edwards case, CNN's Joe Johns reports.  
#Syria says "terrorist groups," not Syrian forces behind #Houla massacre.  
SpaceX Dragon capsule splashes down in Pacific Ocean.  
Defense of Marriage Act unconstitutional, appeals court rules.  
Kidnappers free U.S. tourists in Egypt's Sinai region, official says.  
#Egypt lifts unpopular emergency law in place for more than 30 years.  
Suspect in pair of fatal Seattle shootings died Wednesday, hours after he shot himself in head, police say  
#Hornets win top pick NBA draft lottery; Bobcats 2nd, Wizards 3rd  
Just out of jail, man walks through airport emergency door and onto airliner  
Same man behind 2 shootings that left 4 dead, 2 critical, Seattle police say  
Source: Gay porn actor suspected of dismembering, mailing body parts  
Suspect in Seattle cafe shootings shot himself as police moved in, police say  
Police: 4th person has died after shootings that triggered manhunt in Seattle  
Suspect identified in Canada body parts case, police say  
Two dead, at least three wounded in #Seattle shooting.  
China and Russia speak out against using force in #Syria.  
Wildfire in Michigan's Upper Peninsula destroys 34 homes.  
Former News of the World editor Coulson held, accused of perjury.  
13 found slain in #Syria as world anger mounts.  
Death toll from Italy earthquake rises.  
Former #Liberia president #Taylor sentenced to 50 years for war crimes.  
California death row inmate found dead, hanging in his cell  
Romney wins Texas primary, CNN projects, and unofficially clinches GOP presidential nomination  
Folk music legend #Doc_Watson, 89, has died, his representative says  
Obama administration gives 8 more states waivers on No Child Left Behind  
Pressed by #Wolf_Blitzer, #Donald_Trump stands by "birther" comments  
#Facebook stock closes at $28.84, down nearly 25% from its $38 IPO on May 18  
Sprint's Nextel network gets its shutdown date  
#Serena_Williams loses in 1st round of grand slam tournament for first time #French_Open  
U.S. joins 7 other countries in expelling Syrian diplomats.  
12 reported killed in Italian earthquake.  
UK, France, Spain, others to expel Syrian diplomats over Houla massacre.  
160 Afghan schoolgirls poisoned, official says.  
At least 8 people killed in quake in northern Italy.  
Robbery suspect falls to death from crane on SMU campus.  
A senior al Qaeda leader and another member of terrorist network killed in Afghanistan.  
Fatalities reported in Italy quake.  
Robbery suspect falls 150 feet from crane on SMU campus.  
2 small planes in Virginia collide; pilot and passenger killed. #aviation  
Dad says #Georgia flesh-eating bacteria victim Aimee #Copeland is making jokes.  
President #Obama calls treatment of #veterans of #Vietnam War "a national shame."  
Five-time world champion boxer Johnny #Tapia found dead, police in New Mexico say.  
Authorities in #Canada check reports of debris falling from airliner.  #aviation 
2 small planes collide in Virginia; 1 lands safely. #aviation  
2 killed in #Afghanistan helicopter crash.  
2 murder suspects escape from Arkansas jail.  
Mall fire kills 19 in Doha, Qatar, official says.  
Tropical Storm #Beryl weakens to tropical depression.  
Runoff candidates set for Egypt's presidential election.  
At least 28 injured in Nairobi, Kenya, explosion.  
Kofe Annan visits #Syria as Russia denies supporting Syrian government.  
Kofi Annan to visit Syria as global outrage mounts over massacre.  
Tropical Storm Beryl soaks north Florida and south Georgia, knocks out power for more than 24,000 customers.  
#Beryl not far from land, almost at #hurricane strength.  
Tropical_Storm_Beryl close to hurricane strength as it nears #Georgia, #Florida.  
U.N. Security Council condemns Syrian massacre of 100+ civilians, directly blaming gov't forces for the killings.  
#Dario_Franchitti wins #Indianapolis_500 under caution after Takuma Sato crashes while trying to pass on last lap.  
Michael Haneke wins Palme d'Or at Cannes Film Festival for "Amour."  
U.N. Security Council will meet today on Syria, office of Secretary-General Ban Ki-moon says.  
Sweden wins #Eurovision Song Contest in Azerbaijan  
At least 92 people, including 32 children, killed in attack on Syrian village, U.N. observers say.  
Space station crew enters Dragon capsule; astronaut notes new-car smell.  
Pope's butler arrested in leak of Vatican documents.  
Bud weakens to tropical storm off Mexico's southwestern coast  
Pedro Hernandez charged with 2nd-degree murder in death of Etan Patz  
Postal Service offers $15,000 buyouts to 45,000 mail handlers  
Oregon police say they've found mother of three abandoned children  
U.S. sailor becomes 3,000th death among coalition forces in Afghanistan war  
Hurricane Bud weakens to a Category 1 storm off coast of Mexico.  
Oregon police say they are still unable to identify 3 children found in shed.  
Inspection at Iran nuclear facility finds higher-level traces of uranium, U.N. says.  
Muslim Brotherhood candidate takes lead as #Egypt counts presidential votes.  
Jerry Sandusky's charity seeking approval to close.  
Passenger detained in Miami after disturbance aboard American Airlines flight.  
Private spacecraft docks with space station.  
Hurricane #Bud to slam Mexico's southwestern coast, forecasters say.  
Three children age 3 and under found abandoned in shed, Portland police say.  
What's the #weather like for your neck of the woods? Find out at  
#SpaceX Dragon capsule is approaching the International Space Station. Live:  
Suspect in Etan Patz death heads to court Friday, 33 years to the day after boy's disappearance  
#Hurricane warning issued as #Bud threatens Mexico's west coast.  
Correction: NYPD says #Pedro_Hernandez arrested in 1979 death of #Etan_Patz, 6; police haven't said he is charged.  
Feds: AWOL soldier guilty in Fort Hood plot.  
Escaped Chinese activist Chen Guangcheng tells CNN, "My suffering was beyond imagination"  
Man in New York police custody claims to have strangled Etan Patz, source says.  
Iranian sailors chase off pirates attacking U.S. ship.  
Ohio school-shooting suspect to be tried as adult.  
Man held in Etan Patz case claims to have killed the boy, New York source says.  
Expect 4-8 Atlantic #hurricanes this season, #NOAA says.  
Hurricane #Bud, off the coast of #Mexico, has becomes a Category 2 storm.  
Top horse trainer pleads guilty to cruelty.  
Auction of vial said to contain Ronald Reagan's blood canceled.  
Man in custody in 1979 Etan Patz disappearance, New York police chief says.  
Officials say fire on nuclear sub in Maine shipyard that injured 6 people is out.  
Hurricane Bud forms off southwestern coast of Mexico late Wednesday, according to National Hurricane Center  
#George_Zimmerman's relationship with police evolved prior to #Trayvon_Martin case, city files show.  
Lawmakers to investigate disabled veterans #charity.  
Hewlett_Packard to cut 27,000 jobs.  
Gen. Colin Powell says he supports #same_sex_marriage.  
Secret Service chief denies culture of misconduct in wake of prostitution scandal.  
Shareholders sue #Facebook, banks, claiming information concealed ahead of IPO.  
Defendant says #FAMU drum major asked to be hazed.  
125 girls, 3 teachers poisoned at Afghan school, official says.  
Questions raised by #Niagra suicide attempts.  
Egypt's historic election gets under way; 1st presidential vote since Hosni Mubarak's ouster.  
Arrest made in shooting of 8 persons after #Oklahoma_City_Thunder playoff win.  
Mystery object investigated after pilot report. #aviation  
#Interpol targets 55 suspects using social network sites for child #sex_abuse images.  
Authorities say no bomb involved in diversion of N.C.-bound airliner  
Jetliner diverted after passenger claimed device planted inside her, source says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
US Airways jetliner diverted on flight over Atlantic, airline spokesman says.  
